 Advocates position Digital Humanities as a corrective to the “traditional” and outmoded approaches to literary study that supposedly plague English departments. Like much of the rhetoric surrounding Silicon Valley today, this discourse sees technological innovation as an end in itself and equates the development of disruptive business models with political progress. Yet despite the aggressive promotion of Digital Humanities as a radical insurgency, its institutional success has for the most part involved the displacement of politically progressive humanities scholarship and activism in favor of the manufacture of digital tools and archives. Advocates characterize the development of such tools as revolutionary and claim that other literary scholars fail to see their political import due to fear or ignorance of technology. But the unparalleled level of material support that Digital Humanities has received suggests that its most significant contribution to academic politics may lie in its (perhaps unintentional) facilitation of the neoliberal takeover of the university. Neoliberal policies and institutions value academic work that produces findings immediately usable by industry and that produces graduates trained for the current requirements of the commercial workplace. In pursuit of these goals, the 21st-century university has restructured itself on the model of the corporate world, paying consultants lavish fees, employing miserably paid casual laborers, and constructing a vast new apparatus of bureaucratic control. The humanities are, in their traditional form, less amenable to such restructuring than other disciplines, relying on painstaking individual scholarship and producing forms of knowledge with less immediate economic application. By providing a model for humanities teaching and research that appears to overcome these perceived limitations, Digital Humanities has played a leading role in the corporatist restructuring of the humanities. What Digital Humanities is not about, despite its explicit claims, is the use of digital or quantitative methodologies to answer research questions in the humanities. It is, instead, about the promotion of project-based learning and lab-based research over reading and writing, the rebranding of insecure campus employment as an empowering “alt-ac” career choice, and the redefinition of technical expertise as a form (indeed, the superior form) of humanist knowledge. This is why Digital Humanities is pushed far more strongly by university administrators than it is by scholars and students, who increasingly find themselves pressured to redirect their work toward Digital Humanities. In what follows, we focus on the ways that Digital Humanities scholarship has been imagined and justified by key figures, and on how the rationale for Digital Humanities has complemented and supported the transformation of higher education. While many will be able to say, with some justification, “But that’s not my Digital Humanities!” what we discuss here is the Digital Humanities that is helping to transform the academy, because this is the Digital Humanities that has proved itself so useful to university administrators and to funding bodies. Digital Humanities, Textual Studies, and Interpretation To understand the politics of the Digital Humanities, it is necessary to understand the context from which it emerged. One crucial point of origin, rarely remarked in discussions of the subject, is in the literary studies subfield known as “textual studies.” This subfield has two broadly defined forms. In one approach, usually known as “book history,” scholars study the material history of texts, the people who have made and read them, and the meanings ascribed to them. As with other forms of social history, this is an interpretative activity that can be carried out to affirm received ideas about the world or to challenge them. A second approach to textual studies, usually known as “textual criticism” or “textual scholarship,” concentrates on the production of new editions of old texts. While this can be done in such a way as to challenge received ideas, a more typical approach is to produce an “authoritative” edition supposed to embody the value of the original work. In the textual scholarship approach known as the New Bibliography, that “authority” was equated with authorial intention, so New Bibliographers sought to give literary texts the forms their authors apparently meant them to have. One of the most important centers for the New Bibliography was the English Department of the University of Virginia. The department was the birthplace, as we show below, of the Digital Humanities movement, and its reputation as a safe harbor for conservative intellectuals is key to understanding the story we tell. Fredson Bowers, a leading light of the New Bibliography, was for several decades the Chair of English at the University of Virginia. Some sense of the intellectual climate of that department can be gleaned from a 2009 essay entitled “When Is Diversity Not Diversity” published by Bowers’s conservative colleague, Paul Cantor, in an American Enterprise Institute volume revealingly entitled The Politically Correct University: Under Bowers’s leadership, Virginia became a center of scholarly editing and bibliography at a time when much of the profession had become focused on the theory and practice of interpreting texts, rather than the process of how their exact wording should be determined. But Bowers was a pluralist and a pragmatist, and in trying to build the best English department he could, he brought in professors of all stripes. One of his key hires in the 1960s was E. D. Hirsch, who was worlds apart from Bowers in many respects, but whose hermeneutic theories also emphasized the importance of authorial intention (in contrast to the New Criticism, which rejected what it called the “intentional fallacy”). Informed by Hirsch’s common sense and empiricist spirit, Virginia became known as a bastion of resistance to the abstractness of French literary theory. E. D. Hirsch’s most influential book, Validity in Interpretation (1967), was published at the height of the civil rights and countercultural moments. Although it contains no reference to contemporary politics, it was written with the aim of restoring decorum to literary studies by limiting its object to what Hirsch called “the re-cognition of what an author meant,” an idea that gave philosophical justification to the methodology of the New Bibliography. Hirsch claims not to be a political conservative, but his scholarly arguments were enthusiastically received by those who wanted to reverse the politicization of literary studies. Indeed, his book was a touchstone for those who opposed socially engaged literary study. Hirsch’s work demanded that the critic stop after recovering the author’s intention. Cantor paints Hirsch and Bowers as representing a “diversity” that trumps gender, racial, and ethnic diversity, but to scholars who champion those values, they look like two sides of the same coin. Hirsch’s work entered the national conversation in 1987, when he published a popular work, Cultural Literacy: What Every American Needs to Know. At the time, literary scholars were arguing not only that the canon maintained a biased cultural status quo, but also that the very idea of canonicity was conservative. Hirsch’s book was therefore very welcomed by cultural conservatives who were fighting the critique of the canon, as well as by conservative textual scholars, whose work had always been focused on the production of editions of canonical works. Cultural Literacy claimed that it is possible to identify a “core” of key works that “every American must know.” The book and the project, along with a significant series of follow-on works by Hirsch and others, were celebrated by conservatives, including former Education Secretary William Bennett, who characterized Hirsch’s work as a rebuke to the “multiculturalism” that he claimed was ruining American education. Hirsch’s argument was foundational for the Common Core educational program favored by the political right. The idea that interpretation is inherently progressive is questionable, but conservative commentators nonetheless have converged on the view that readers shouldn’t interpret and evaluate texts for themselves, especially with regard to politics. At its foundations, political interpretation historicizes (“relativizes”) claims to superior cultural status, especially for the favored texts and artifacts of privileged groups. Hirsch’s own puzzlement at the left’s rejection of his work — even after minor concessions to cultural representation for women and minorities — is echoed in the aggressive incomprehension with which many Digital Humanists respond to the argument that their work supports the rise of the neoliberal university. It is telling that Digital Humanities, like Hirsch, and like Bowers, has found an institutional home at the University of Virginia. We argue that, like Hirsch’s tightly constrained approach to literary criticism, and like Bowers’s similarly constrained approach to textual scholarship, Digital Humanities has often tended to be anti-interpretive, especially when interpretation is understood as a political activity. Digital Humanities instead aims to archive materials, produce data, and develop software, while bracketing off the work of interpretation to a later moment or leaving it to other scholars — or abandoning it altogether for those who argue that we ought to become “postcritical.” Computing in the Humanities, Computing as the Humanities Computer use in the humanities of course predates the formal movement that calls itself Digital Humanities. The trailblazer is usually identified as a Jesuit priest, Roberto Busa, whose 56-volume concordance to the works of St. Thomas Aquinas was produced over a period of three decades from 1949, with support from IBM. In the early 1980s, computing became centrally important to the discipline of lexicography, thanks to work done by academic linguists at the University of Birmingham and professional lexicographers at Oxford University Press. The former employed statistical analysis of large volumes of text to study contemporary word usage, contributing to dictionaries and English language teaching materials published by Collins, the financial backer for much of their work. The latter continued to produce the sort of historical scholarship for which they had long been known, but were able to use new computer technology to store, edit, and typeset their work in producing what would become the 20-volume second edition of the Oxford English Dictionary. Such work required tremendous amounts of primary scholarship. But it also required new forms of technical infrastructure. In many institutions, this was provided on an ad hoc basis, but some universities began providing generalized Humanities Computing services. These were mostly run not by full-time professors but by staff members from the library and elsewhere. Often enough, this support was understood very literally: Humanities Computing professionals were frequently called upon to help professors get their computers to work. They were also called upon to build or to help build digital projects (especially archives) for which professors did not have technical expertise. It is understandable that Humanities Computing specialists might have seen themselves as second-class citizens, especially in the North American university, with its academic caste system that divides workers into “faculty” and “staff.” North American universities are organized around the research generated, or at least directed, by faculty. Faculty are immediately rewarded for those kinds of research activities, while staff tend to be rewarded in less direct ways, if at all. The academic need for Humanities Computing resources was growing all the time, and this was especially true at the University of Virginia. In 1986, when Hirsch was writing Cultural Literacy, his department hired the scholar who would do more than any other to define Digital Humanities: Jerome McGann. McGann, one of the leading US scholars of British Romanticism, had sought to bring textual scholarship into the academic mainstream, not by demanding that literary studies adopt the textual scholar’s obsession with authorial intention, but by demanding that textual scholarship adopt literary theory’s philosophical sophistication — and indeed, take that sophistication further, foregrounding the instability not only of meanings but of physical texts themselves. McGann situated his approach within the New Historicism, a form of cultural studies that rose to prominence in the 1980s. McGann’s encyclopedic approach to textual editing took paper-based scholarship to its limit, leading him eventually to seize on the potential of computer technology to extend his work. In the 1990s, he began to construct a total online edition of the poet and painter Dante Gabriel Rossetti: an edition containing facsimiles and transcripts of every manuscript, every sketch, every painting, and every publication — in short, of every single version of every single Rossetti work. It was a project that caught the imagination of many people in textual studies. Textual scholarship has a tendency to fetishize the historical archive as the guarantor of knowledge. Here, computers appeared to be facilitating the construction of the most complete and integrated archive that the literary world had yet seen. And it certainly didn’t hurt that the object of all this effort was the canonical oeuvre of a dead white man. For the initial “seven, eight, or even ten years” of the Rossetti project, McGann was by his own admission narrowly focused on technical issues. This focus would provide a new way to argue for the relevance of textual scholarship, rebranding it as “the future” on the grounds that it required technical skills that were outside the remit of literary training as it then existed. Such a project could only be carried out with extensive support from Humanities Computing. It therefore seems appropriate that the University of Virginia should have been the location in which Humanities Computing practitioners made a tactical decision. Rather than accommodate themselves to the requirements of the humanities research and teaching system, they would — in the style of Silicon Valley “disruptors” — attempt to force the system to accommodate them. Thus, Digital Humanities was born from disdain and at times outright contempt, not just for humanities scholarship, but for the standards, procedures, and claims of leading literary scholars. Those scholars had told the Humanities Computing specialists, even if only implicitly, that their work didn’t count as scholarship. Now, it was time to prove them wrong. The goal was not merely to show what technical expertise could bring to humanities research. Rather, it was to redefine what had been formerly classified as support functions for the humanities as the very model of good humanities scholarship. This agenda crystalized at two events held at and coordinated by the University of Virginia English Department, the “Is Humanities Computing an Academic Discipline?” conference in 1999 and the publicly funded “Digital Humanities Curriculum Seminar” that ran from 2001 to 2002. These events formally rebranded Humanities Computing as Digital Humanities and established textual scholarship as the discipline’s core concern. When we speak of Digital Humanities, we acknowledge the significance of the institutional shift that occurred at these events. The events themselves did little to change the nature of the research projects to be undertaken in the humanities, but did much to shape Digital Humanities as a social movement in the contemporary academy, especially North American departments of English. The political affinity between Humanities Computing and textual scholarship has already been noted by some who were active in both fields, such as Martha Nell Smith, an early Digital Humanist and founder of one of the first Digital Humanities centers, the Maryland Institute for Technology in the Humanities (MITH). Despite her early and continuing involvement in Digital Humanities, Smith has emerged as a leading critic of the movement: When I first started attending humanities computing conferences in the mid-1990s, I was struck by how many of the presentations remarked, either explicitly or implicitly, that concerns that had taken over so much academic work in literature — of gender, race, class, sexuality — were irrelevant to humanities computing. […] [I]n the wake of the sixties, the humanities in general and their standings in particular had suffered, according to some, from being feminized by these things. […] Quite frankly, those observations also seemed to apply to much of STS [the Society for Textual Scholarship] […] More than a few participants in STS seemed to think of it as a space free from all the messiness of questions of identity and politics. The University of Virginia conferences were overseen by three senior scholars at that institution: McGann himself; John Unsworth, a pioneer of Humanities Computing; and Johanna Drucker, an eclectic scholar and artist with an idiosyncratic relationship to the humanities (Drucker now teaches in the University of California, Los Angeles Department of Information Studies). McGann and Drucker would soon go on to direct and create the early Digital Humanities project known as SpecLab, in which prototypes for many projects such as the Rossetti Archive and “The Ivanhoe Game” were first designed. The majority of the participants in the two University of Virginia conferences were Humanities Computing specialists and graduate students, including Steven Ramsay, Matthew Kirschenbaum, and Bethany Nowviskie, who became arguably the most influential Digital Humanities practitioners of the next generation. While the reading lists and position statements with which the events were launched make formal nods toward the importance of historical, sociological, and philosophical approaches to science and technology, the outcome was the establishment, essentially by fiat, of Digital Humanities as an academic and not a support field, with the accompanying assertion that technical and managerial expertise simply was humanist knowledge. The unavoidable implication was that other humanists were wrong — not so much about how they went about answering humanist questions as about the very definition of the humanities. This view reaches its apotheosis in the repeated suggestion that building computational tools should qualify as a replacement for scholarly writing: an idea that runs counter to the culture not only of English departments but also of Computer Science departments, which have never handed out PhDs for competence in programming alone. Versions of this principle — the idea that technical support is the cutting edge of the humanities — continue to surface. For example, in the characteristic assertion that, “One day, creating [and] maintaining platforms to enable the dissemination of [and] engagement with scholarly content will ‘count’ as scholarship.” Carried to its logical conclusion, such a declaration would entail that the workers in IT departments of corporations such as Elsevier and Google are engaged in humanities scholarship. Often, the contribution of computational projects to scholarly knowledge has been slight — and some Digital Humanities advocates have been at pains to defend their frequent inability to explain the point of much digital humanist activity. For example, Tom Scheinfeldt, Director of Digital Humanities at the University of Connecticut, played for time: “Eventually digital humanities must […] answer questions. But yet?” Outside Digital Humanities, of course, even an undergraduate dissertation needs a question to answer if it is to be taken seriously. The implication is that in Digital Humanities, computer use is an end in itself. At the same time that scholars at the University of Virginia argued for the rebranded Humanities Computing as the future of the humanities, a separate development was taking shape at Stanford University, under the leadership of Franco Moretti. Moretti is a Marxist literary critic who — while continuing to practice the form of interpretive scholarship known as “close reading” — wished to extend the range of methodologies available to literary studies with what he wittily called “distant reading”: essentially, the application to literature of forms of quantification previously associated with the social sciences. In itself, this was not particularly revolutionary, as a strong tradition of quantitative research on literature already existed, especially in the sociology of culture and in certain forms of linguistics. However, this quantitative work tended to be published in journals humanists didn’t read. Moretti’s innovation, then, was to present a version of this quantitative tradition in humanities journals such as New Left Review. Moretti was not employed in Humanities Computing, and did not do software design or maintenance himself, but relied on technical support staff, and, in presenting the fruits of their labors in a form that traditional humanities scholars could understand, implicitly argued for the value of skills he himself neither possessed nor practiced. Moretti was not initially associated with Digital Humanities, but was rather claimed for it when his work seemed to point toward the scholarly breakthroughs its advocates had been promising. The interest generated by Moretti’s work led others to import a range of quantitative methods from outside the humanities, but also created confusion about why those procedures were valuable. It was not the code through which they were implemented but the theoretical and methodological traditions from which they had emerged that really mattered. While some scholars affiliated with the Digital Humanities movement became conversant with the intellectual background of the procedures they employed, producing valuable work that could have seen publication in the venues within which the procedures themselves had been developed, the fetishizing of code and data and the relative neglect of critical discourse within Digital Humanities have led to the emergence of an environment in which one is more likely to encounter oddities such as Michael Dalvean’s recent claim that the probability scores yielded by a machine learning algorithm are an “objective” measure of literary value. It is indicative of the Digital Humanities movement’s general disdain for scholarship as it had hitherto been defined that arguments making as little sense as Dalvean’s can appear in leading Digital Humanities journals, with the result that much of the more interesting side of Digital Humanities research has a tendency to resemble a slapdash form of computational linguistics adorned with theoretical claims that would never pass muster within computational linguistics itself. The success of the Digital Humanities movement perhaps owes less to the honorable exceptions to this trend (which tend to be distinguished by the comparative modesty of their claims as much as by their attention to questions of validity) than by the compatibility of the movement’s favored research models with administrative demands that academic work be tied, at least potentially, to external revenue streams. From the viewpoint of the neoliberal university, the best kind of research (and the kind to be most handsomely rewarded) is the kind that brings in the most external funding. This is one of the main reasons why the digitization of archives and the development of software tools — conspicuously expensive activities that influential funding bodies have enthusiastically supported — can exert such powerful attraction, effectively enabling scholarship to be reconfigured on the model of the tech startup, with public, private, and charitable funding in place of Silicon Valley venture capital. Funding Digital Humanities Such funding comes from a range of sources, but some have been vastly more influential than others. The main US public research funding body, the National Endowment for the Humanities (NEH), and the charitable Andrew W. Mellon Foundation, were key early funders of Digital Humanities. One of the early spurs for the development of Digital Humanities at the University of Virginia was a $1,500,000 Mellon Foundation Distinguished Achievement Award to Jerome McGann in 2003, which partly funded many early projects including SpecLab and the Rossetti Archive. After heavily funding Digital Humanities projects for almost a decade, the NEH founded an Office of Digital Humanities in 2008, setting up a permanent and separate funding stream devoted to the kind of work promoted under the Digital Humanities brand. And in 2010, Google itself launched a Digital Humanities Research Program with a particular focus on the production of tools that would integrate with its existing commercial services, especially Google Books. Google’s financial support for Digital Humanities has been intermittent, but the announcement of the program had a dramatic impact, triggering an avalanche of top-down promotion of Digital Humanities as university administrators sought to capitalize on what appeared to be a major new funding stream. And Google’s own Digital Humanities–esque project, the Google Ngram viewer, which allows users to search for frequencies of words and phrases drawn from the Google Books database, has been the subject of Uncharted: Big Data as a Lens on Human Culture, by Erez Aiden and Jean-Baptiste Michel: a breathless pro-industry volume whose contempt for non-data-driven and -industry-centered scholarship is as palpable as its political disengagement. Although not emerging from Digital Humanities proper, the Ngram Viewer has inspired much Digital Humanities work, and represents exactly the kind of “success” that drives the movement’s public relations: a technique is appropriated from an academic field not associated with humanist scholarship (here, linguistics), shorn of the theoretical checks that once regulated its use, and given the appearance of revolution through application to a dataset that appears capable of silencing all criticism through sheer size. The priority accorded to Digital Humanities by the Canadian government in its support for humanities research funding is directly comparable. Digital Humanities projects are compatible with two of the six “Future Challenge Areas” currently named by the Social Science and Humanities Research Council of Canada (SSHRC). In the first, priority goes to research that answers the question, “What new ways of learning, particularly in higher education, will Canadians need to thrive in an evolving society and labour market?” In the second, researchers are enjoined to study how emerging technologies can be “leveraged to benefit Canadians.” Canada’s leading Digital Humanities specialist, Raymond Siemens, who held a Canada Research Chair in Humanities Computing from 2004 to 2015, is one of 15 members of SSHRC’s core council. The priority accorded to Digital Humanities by the SSHRC only amplifies general tendencies that affect all applicants. Those who wish to acquire a sizeable grant, and who do not have site-based research needs, must develop a compelling rationale to employ graduate students. One of the simplest ways to justify the need for graduate students is to set up a named lab — a lab that requires not just funding but continual funding, and whose students can work on an evolving list of projects. In turn, applicants must explain how graduate students’ research enhances their employability. This makes Digital Humanities labs especially attractive, and makes researchers feel as if they cannot win large grants without doing Digital Humanities. The biggest projects require wages for graduate students, technical staff such as developers, consultants working on paid short-term contracts, and salaried project managers. SSHRC’s model of funding therefore complements the development of new models of intellectual work within the neoliberal university — accelerating the devaluation of older models of literary study. The impact of these changes to the North American funding environment has been much greater than the total sums involved might suggest. Because university administrators tend to value research according to the size of the grant that supports it, and because funding for the humanities is otherwise mostly limited to salary replacement sabbatical grants to individual faculty members, this specific targeting of large-value grants toward Digital Humanities projects has had a transformative effect upon the humanities throughout the United States and Canada, where it is difficult to get six-figure grants for English scholarship without engaging in computational work. Despite the Office of Digital Humanities being the smallest office in NEH, its proactive allocation of funds has had a remarkable effect on administrative priorities, promoting methodologies that, until the emergence of these funding sources, had little support within the fields themselves. The work that the NEH and the Mellon Foundation tend to fund remains largely confined to the “tools and archives” paradigm that many in Digital Humanities claim to have surpassed, but that continues to drive the institutional expansion of Digital Humanities through its likely receipt of major research grants. This is no coincidence. Digital Humanities enabled the creation of new pools of funding specifically devoted to an entirely new conception of the humanities that was promulgated by a small minority within English departments. Why these funders chose to do this remains something of a mystery. To find precise explanations, we would need to have access to private conversations and communications, though it is remarkable that such an epoch-making shift can be so lacking in explicit justification. What we do know is that in the early 2000s, both Mellon and NEH began devoting unusually large amounts of resources to these projects, while leaving the rest of their funding streams largely unchanged, and that this had more influence than anything else in raising the profile of Digital Humanities by creating an expectation of reward for those working on the lines laid down at the aforementioned University of Virginia humanities computing and Digital Humanities events (the latter of which was funded by the NEH in both of the years that it ran). Exceptions to the general trends of course abound. The problem is that these exceptions too easily function as alibis. “Look, not everyone committed to Digital Humanities is a white man.” “Look, there are Digital Humanities projects committed to politically engaged scholarly methods and questions.” We are not negating the value of these exceptions when we ask: What is the dominant current supported even by the invocation of these exceptions? The appeal of Digital Humanities is undeniable: as the burden of paying for university is increasingly shifted to students, and university staffing is increasingly temporary, the acquisition of marketable skills, and the ability to justify those skills as integral to the market-oriented evolution of knowledge and education, becomes all but essential. Rather than act in vocal opposition to the university’s transformation, and to the forces driving it, the Digital Humanities social movement seeks to prove that a humanities education is beneficial to job seekers by reinventing that education as a course of training in the advanced use of information technology. It unavoidably also suggests that other approaches in the humanities fit less well into the contemporary university, because the implied measure of success is economic. What Now? For enthusiasts, Digital Humanities is “open” and “collaborative” and committed to making the “traditional” humanities rethink “outdated” tendencies: all Silicon Valley buzzwords that cast other approaches in a remarkably negative light, much as does the venture capitalist’s contempt for “incumbents.” Yet being taken seriously as a Digital Humanities scholar seems to require that one stake one’s claim as a builder and maker, become adept at the management and visualization of data, and conceive of the study of literature as now fundamentally about the promotion of new technologies. We have presented these tendencies as signs that the Digital Humanities as social and institutional movement is a reactionary force in literary studies, pushing the discipline toward post-interpretative, non-suspicious, technocratic, conservative, managerial, lab-based practice. The movement’s level of institutional support may be exceptional, but its biases are not. They accord with a variety of other postcritical methodologies, such as versions of Speculative Realism and Object-Oriented Ontology, and the explicitly “postcritical” literary theory advocated by scholars such as University of Virginia English Professor Rita Felski, which tend to challenge, avoid, or disavow scholarly endeavor that is overtly critical of existing social relations. We therefore suggest that it is not the “traditional” scholarly world, with its hierarchies and glorified experts and close reading of works read by only a precious few people, to which the Digital Humanities social movement is most meaningfully opposed. What it stands in opposition to, rather, is the insistence that academic work should be critical, and that there is, after all, no work and no way to be in the world that is not political. This is what textual scholarship à la Bowers as well as E. D. Hirsch’s approach to literary interpretation share with Digital Humanities, and so the fact that all three have shared an institutional base in the same department is hard to overlook. We say this knowing that we will be read — despite two of us having long histories as digital researchers — as outsiders who do not know what we are talking about, as zany zealots with no real knowledge of the field, as people with no right to comment, whose views are anyway retrograde and irrelevant. But in fact, our critique echoes and builds upon much that has already been said by some within the field, although to very little apparent effect. Alan Liu, one of the earliest supporters of Digital Humanities, wrote half a decade ago that: While digital humanists develop tools, data, and other meta-data critically […] rarely do they extend their critique to the full register of society, economics, politics, or culture. How the digital humanities advances, channels, or resists today’s great postindustrial, neoliberal, corporate, and global flows of information-cum-capital is thus a question rarely heard in the digital humanities associations, conferences, journals, and projects with which I am familiar. Not even the clichéd forms of such issues — for example, “the digital divide,” surveillance,” “privacy,” “copyright,” and so on — get much play. It is as if, when the order comes down from the funding agencies, university administrations, and other bodies mediating today’s dominant socioeconomic and political beliefs, digital humanists just concentrate on pushing the “execute” button on projects that amass the most data for the greatest number, process that data most efficiently and flexibly (flexible efficiency being the hallmark of postindustrialism), and manage the whole through ever “smarter” standards, protocols, schemas, templates, and databases uplifting Frederick Winslow Taylor’s original scientific industrialism into ultraflexible postindustrial content management systems camouflaged as digital editions, libraries, and archives — all without pausing to reflect on the relation of the whole digital juggernaut to the new world order. The problem to which Liu draws attention is a theme that has recurred throughout this article: purported technical expertise trumps all other forms of knowledge, including critique of the uses to which such expertise is put. (What counts as “expertise,” however, turns out to be highly variable. For example, most of the senior scholars mentioned here — Moretti, Liu, McGann, Drucker, and Smith — openly disclaim any ability to code, even as other major figures in the field insist on this as a minimum qualification.) Digital Humanities has achieved its institutional prominence precisely because of a willingness on the part of many of its key figures to play the role that Liu describes. Liu’s repeatedly published complaints of the absence of “cultural criticism” from Digital Humanities might have had some effect if that absence was coincidental, but it is not. Indeed, the institutional success of Digital Humanities appears to be explained in large part by its designed-in potential to drive social, cultural, and political critique from the humanities as a whole. A parallel can be drawn with the often-remarked raced and gendered makeup of Digital Humanities, whose key figures remain (mostly) white men even as greater numbers of female scholars and scholars from minoritized backgrounds have entered the “big tent.” The problem has been highlighted again and again, yet nothing changes besides the occasional invitation of female scholars to speak alongside the established male stars. At the Digital Humanities 2015 conference, noted media studies scholar Deb Verhoeven addressed the men present as follows: You have made a world designed around ensuring your own personal comfort, but it’s not comfortable for many, many other people. […] This is not about issuing another policy advisory for “inclusion.” This is not about developing a new checklist to mitigate your biases. And its definitely not about inviting a token female speaker to join you – this actually needs to be about your plans to exit the stage. This is not about learning how to do it better next time – this is about you leaving before there’s a next time. […] This is about letting other people in by letting go of your privileged position. Such a recommendation is, of course, extremely unlikely to be followed. With astonishing bravery, Verhoeven told the men in attendance that the problem is “how many of you occupy the positions that get to speak,” i.e. to define what Digital Humanities is taken to be. We might say in the same spirit that if Digital Humanities means to be (as it claims) a truly “big tent,” defined by openness to all perspectives and diversity of projects and applications — a definition capacious enough to make one wonder what purpose the label could serve at all — it will be necessary for its chief practitioners, associated with the biggest projects and the biggest labs, to mute themselves for a number of years so that the voices of the outsiders they claim to welcome may be amplified in turn. But the idea is laughable: major research institutions, from the University of Virginia to University College London, have invested in Digital Humanities precisely in order to consolidate their grip on available research funding, and are about as likely to renounce their market dominance as are Facebook, Amazon, or Google. And even if it were to be taken seriously as a proposal, it could hardly correct the structural and institutional conditions that explain the unique position of Digital Humanities today. In an article on what she sees as the unrealized radical potential of the field, Miriam Posner writes that “[w]e can’t allow Digital Humanities to recapitulate the inequities and underrepresentations that plague Silicon Valley,” but we argue that its spectacular institutional success is a consequence of its constitution, from the outset, as precisely such a recapitulation. In the academy and outside of it, the privileging of technical expertise above other forms of knowledge is a political gesture, and one that has proved highly effective in neutralizing critique of established power relations. We offer our analysis of the Digital Humanities social movement as a way of resisting that gesture and as an inducement to other scholars to do the same.  IN “Neoliberal Tools (and Archives): A Political History of Digital Humanities,” Daniel Allington, Sarah Brouillette, and David Golumbia have produced a timely and trenchant critique of the Digital Humanities: a new field of humanistic research and scholarly production that they associate with the increasing corporatization of the university. Many of their core assertions carry a good deal of truth. The Digital Humanities promotes, largely though not exclusively, a research model that aligns closely with the commercial workplace in its emphasis on “deliverables” and technological literacy. The Digital Humanities also generally relies upon a funding structure that derives heavily from the sciences, and is closely tied to industry giants, such as Google. Over the past week, numerous colleagues who work in the field of Digital Humanities have reacted negatively to this polemic. We agree with those who wished for more nuance in Allington et al’s portrait of a diverse field. And yet we also do not want the usual scholarly demand for nuance to cloud the piece’s ideological commitments or its desire to critique our current state of affairs. Indeed, the essay’s central argument — that the Digital Humanities valorizes and rewards a non-critical form of research — has resonated with countless colleagues, both within and beyond DH. We are three scholars who are involved in the Digital Humanities, broadly defined. Like its three authors, we are literary scholars who trained in academic fields rich in critical capacity (poetics, comparative literature, the history of the book). We too have often found ourselves highly resistant to DH. Like Allington et al, we frequently find DH to be an unpalatable brew of technological boosterism. And yet we have repeatedly found ourselves in situations where the use of computation and quantitative analysis was the most effective means for challenging apolitical claims about cultural practices — to advocate, in other words, for the “politically progressive” type of scholarship that the authors wish to see more of in the humanities. Whether it has been an analysis of the economics of creative writing programs and their demographics or the institutional elitism and gender disparities of academic publishing, we have come to appreciate the ways that data has often forced us to rethink our original assumptions. It is in this context that we offer the following concerns over what Allington et al’s approach to the problems of DH forecloses. The first is the origin story of DH. The authors tell a strangely idiosyncratic history that invests a single institution (UVA) and a narrow cohort of scholars with the apparent power to invent and direct the substance of an entire field of knowledge. They overlook the much longer history of institutional conflicts over knowledge and infrastructure in the humanities that dates back, as Chad Wellmon has documented, at least to the nineteenth century. The history the authors provide also risks effacing contributions from individuals in the present – particularly women and persons of color – who work outside of this institutional framework. There is a tremendous amount of new scholarship being produced in DH that seeks to answer significant research questions, and a great deal of this work directly addresses issues related to race, gender, class, and power. A number of scholars, such as Roopika Risam and Schyuler Esprit, have insisted upon the existence of this subaltern history; they are the living proof that it exists. A significant part of this work resides outside of English departments and so it remains invisible in this account. We have learned a great deal from Tanya Clement on the relationship between information science and feminism; Tara McPherson on the politics of code and interface design; Hoyt Long on modern Japanese literature and translation networks; Ted Underwood on gender difference, language, and the Anglophone novel; Lauren Klein on American slavery and the critical use of archival analysis and data visualization; Franco Moretti on the rhetoric of the World Bank; Marit Macarthur on using audio databases to study poetry; Cameron Blevins on the production of space in 19th-century U.S. history; or James Evans’ work on network models of scientific research.This list is by no means exhaustive, but it would be unfair to label any of it uncritical or disinterested in research questions. Nor is it fair to paint all digital archives with the broad brush of “neoliberalism.” The curation and preservation of information has been a core mission of the humanities since its inception. Digital initiatives such as the Orlando Women’s Writing Project, the Post-Classical Islamic Philosophy Database, or the Project on the History of Black Writing represent just a few of the databases that seek to preserve and promote the voices of social groups otherwise under-represented or erased in scholarship. Although the existence of this work does not disqualify many of the larger structural complaints made by Allington et al., it feels crucial to at least acknowledge its existence. This is the Digital Humanities we want to see more of. But there is a second more general problem embedded in Allington et al.’s assertion that DH’s “institutional success has for the most part involved the displacement of politically progressive humanities scholarship and activism.” This claim suggests that there has been a dominant politically progressive humanities scholarship to be displaced. But the close and critical study of literature has often been implicated in and promoted by corporate and state projects. Many scholars, for instance, have traced New Criticism’s emphasis on close reading at the expense of more historical and contextual modes of reading to its segregationist roots. We are hesitant to assert that any method can be a priori politically determined. Its use is determined by the user (and their content), for ill or good. To suggest that one approach, in either direction, is either critically or politically more progressive is too reductive. And the current binaries under which much of the debates surrounding DH transpire — close vs. distant reading, surface vs. depth, macro vs. micro, even critical vs. uncritical — are overly simplistic and untenable. And yet, again, we are sympathetic to the observations that provoked this essay. Even while some of us have benefited from DH funding, we have had similar worries that DH receives a disproportionate amount of governmental funding; that it has more industry ties; that in aggregate it produces less politically progressive scholarship than humanities scholarship at large; that it often seems more concerned with placing students in jobs in the technology industry than it is with the critical study of culture and history. These are serious claims and it would be intellectually disingenuous to mask them with a defense of DH or to argue that the existence of a few astute projects provides a counter-narrative. At this point we need more evidence. Ultimately what has most troubled us about Allington et al’s essay is its final line, which is its core assertion: they call on colleagues in the humanities to resist the rise of the digital humanities. They have carefully studied the field of the digital humanities and declare that it must be shut down; nothing good can come from it.  We worry about this foreclosing of possibility. Other academic disciplines, such as sociology, have benefited greatly from the merging of critical and computational modes of analysis, particularly in overturning entrenched notions of gender or racial difference based on subjective bias. We find it is too early to reject in toto the use of digital methods for the humanities. The urgent questions articulated by “Neoliberal Tools” thus present a rich opportunity to think about the field’s methodological potential. Questions about the over-representation of white men or the disproportionate lack of politically progressive scholarship in the digital humanities regard inequality and have a strong empirical basis. As such, they cannot be fully answered using the critical toolbox of current humanistic scholarship. These concerns are potentially measurable, and in measuring them, the full immensity of their impact becomes increasingly discernable, and thus, answerable. The informed and critical use of quantitative and computational analysis would thus be one way to add to the disciplinary critique that the authors themselves wish to see. FOR AT LEAST THE PAST DECADE, the term “digital humanities” (DH) has captured the imagination and the ire of scholars across American universities. Supporters of the field, which melds computer science with hermeneutics, champion it as the much-needed means to shake up and expand methods of traditional literary interpretation; for most outspoken critics, it is a new fad that symbolizes the neoliberal bean-counting destroying American higher education. Somewhere in the middle of these two extremes lies a vast and varied body of work that utilizes and critically examines digital tools in the pursuit of humanistic study. This field is large and increasingly indefinable even by those in its midst. In fact, “digital humanities” seems astoundingly inappropriate for an area of study that includes, on one hand, computational research, digital reading and writing platforms, digital pedagogy, open-access publishing, augmented texts, and literary databases, and on the other, media archaeology and theories of networks, gaming, and wares both hard and soft. As Franco Moretti said to me in the first of these interviews: “‘digital humanities’ means nothing.” For Bethany Nowviskie, the digital humanities means a great deal, although she states that defining what this meaning is exactly has been a “distraction” and “detraction” from the work itself. As current director of the Digital Library Federation at CLIR (the Council on Library and Information Resources) and a Research Associate Professor of Digital Humanities at the University of Virginia, Nowviskie brings a unique perspective to this series that is informed by years of work within the Institute for Advanced Technology in the Humanities and the library. Perhaps more than anyone in this series, Nowviskie speaks to the tremendous interdisciplinarity and public power of the field, however it comes to be defined. Because of this, she is an exciting addition to the series, which aims to explore, through conversations with both leading practitioners in the field and vocal critics, the intersection of the digital and the humanities, and this intersection’s impact on research and teaching, American higher education, and the increasingly tenuous connection between the ivory tower of elite institutions and the general public. When I first crossed over into more digital research in my own work as a CLIR fellow and PhD in literature, Nowviskie’s blog nowviskie.org was a tremendous resource, and it has been ever since. Both humorous and insightful, Nowviskie takes on some of the most significant and taboo topics in the academy, including alt-ac, a phrase she popularized in founding #Alt-Academy, an open access publication on “alternative” academic careers; the lack of female representation in data mining; the role of digital humanities in an era of climate change and environmental degradation; and, most recently, the need for a feminist-based ethic of care in both digital and humanities fields. Nowviskie’s CV also reads like a who’s-who of digital projects, including SpecLab, the Rossetti Archive, Temporal Modeling, Neatline, and NINES, to name a few. She has published and spoken extensively on the digital humanities and was notably the director of the Scholars’ Lab at Virginia and president of the Association for Computing in the Humanities before beginning her tenure with DLF. This breadth of experience makes for an interesting perspective on the digital in the humanities as it exists both within the realm of higher education and without.  ¤ MELISSA DINSMAN: How did you first come to enter what I am broadly going to call the “digital” field? BETHANY NOWVISKIE: I’m tempted to tell you I was simply in the right place at the right time, but that would elide all of the hard institutional and administrative work that went into creating that place — of which I was fairly oblivious at the outset. I was an undergraduate student at the University of Virginia at two important moments. The first was the creation of UVA’s Institute for Advanced Technology in the Humanities (IATH) — a pioneering enterprise, one of the first such things of its kind. I was lucky enough to have mentors and advisors in both my major fields of study — English and Archaeology — undertaking research projects there. The second was, really, what we might call the birth of the web: the moment when it became possible for almost anybody (I did it with zero formal training) to buy a “Teach Yourself HTML” book and suddenly, with no mediation, no formal publisher — for better or worse, with no editor — to begin creating online resources, to begin writing and publishing and collecting and curating content online. So I graduated and went away for a bit to train as a teacher and do other things, but I kept tinkering and learning on the side. I created what I believe was the first real website on the poet John Keats, in 1995, and I learned enough rudimentary programming to design sonnet generators and give a literary twist to early chatbots. I was basically creating toys, with the vocabulary of Romantic poets, just for fun, but my heart was at IATH, where Jerome McGann was starting his great Rossetti Archive project. So it didn’t take me long to go back there for graduate work and throw myself headlong into what we called “humanities computing.” It was obvious to me that we were at the start of something big. So it seems pretty obvious that digital work has been a part of your research trajectory for a substantial period of time. Do you think your work qualifies as “digital humanities”? Do you care? I am really uninterested in the definitional stuff. We’ve gone through, as I’ve seen it over the past 20 years, two major phases of effort to delineate a “field.” Both have tended to distract or even detract from attention on the work itself. The first was a long period — already underway for decades when I came in — in which the very small international community doing humanities computing was struggling to have its output recognized as scholarship at all, rather than service or something completely oblique to the disciplines. So we worked hard to replicate institutional structures that would signal seriousness: journals, professional associations, guidelines for tenure and promotion, and we evolved a crazy level of rigor (not seen elsewhere in the humanities) in peer review just to get into our conferences. John Unsworth and I organized a lecture series in 1999 called “Is Humanities Computing an Academic Discipline?” By the early 2000s, I was working with McGann and others on NINES, a project meant to legitimize digital scholarly editing in 19th-century studies. That was all good infrastructure-building and self-examination, but I look back and wonder what we might have done as a community if we had been less concerned with fitting to preexisting molds. What was the second phase? Well, then, in more recent years, the public profile of DH work skyrocketed and it came to be seen by some as a pathway to academic success in a bad market. That prompted job seekers and faculty reevaluating their graduate curriculum and newer practitioners, trying to map their training against what felt like shifting sands, to become intensely interested in the meta-conversation of where you draw the boundaries around the digital humanities. So there’s a lot of DH punditry out there, and some of the loudest is not especially embedded in practical experience. But there have also been occasions when open discussions about the core skills, findings, and interests of the long-term practitioner community have come across as not just provocative, but exclusionary. Not: “We have found deep, hands-on engagement with knowledge representation and the defamiliarization of arts and letters that comes when you try to mash them into unambiguous computational systems to be valuable: you might, too,” but rather, “If you only use but don’t build humanities toolsets, you’re not part of our research field.” And that has been unproductive. Despite the ambiguous boundaries of the DH field, do you think there are any digital or media subfields in particular that yield the most benefit to the humanities and why? Oh, it’s library and information science all the way, especially in terms of broad benefit to the humanities and helping it intersect with other fields. This is increasingly evident now that there’s such crucial work to be done in interdisciplinary, data-rich areas with deep implications for human lives, like the environmental humanities. And now we’ve moved into an era in which the library itself — which has always been a kind of laboratory for the liberal arts — takes on that function in new ways and at a vastly greater, networked scale. This potential and centrality and need is part of what attracted me to my new role at the Digital Library Federation. And by library science I’m talking about work in digitization, data curation and digital stewardship, metadata and description, search and discovery interfaces, visualization and analysis, embodied interaction like augmented reality and physical computing, leveraging linked open data so as to help scholars make meaning across a variety of disparate datasets — all the things that libraries are and do today — plus the ways they interact with and serve the communities (and not just academic research communities, but also larger publics) that they’re embedded in. People often speak of digital work (and more frequently the digital humanities) as a means of making the humanities relevant in the 21st–century university. Do you think this statement is a fair assessment of digital work and its purpose? Do you think it is fair to the humanities? Relevant within the university? I’m much more interested in the place of the humanities outside it. And there I do think technology plays an important role — for a lot of the same, simple reasons I cited before, in describing my own early attraction to the work. It’s the ability for anyone — not just scholars but citizens, community organizers — to get a message out to a wider audience in fairly unmoderated ways. Maybe even playful ways, which are sometimes the most engaging and viral in raising public appreciation for arts and culture, which should remain a core mission of the academic humanities — or to bring powerful techniques like data mining and visualization, which are being developed and refined in scholarly contexts, into politics, social commentary, journalism, and activism. So how can we reconcile the digital humanities benefit outside the academy with critiques of the field that connect the emergence of DH to the increased “neoliberalization and corporatization of higher education”? (I am quoting media scholar Richard Grusin here from his C21 post “The Dark Side of the Digital Humanities.”) Do you think such a comparison has merit? Is there something about the digital humanities’s desire to produce that creates an alignment with neoliberal thinking? Well, sure, DH is complicit in the modern university in the same way that every other practice and part of the humanities that succumbs to certain logics and economies of production and consumption is complicit. So, part of that struggle to enter the mainstream academy I was telling you about succeeded insofar as we, too, in DH now participate in screwed-up metrics and systems of scholarly communication along with everybody else. I’m talking here about how almost everyone in the academic humanities is caught up in the provision of free labor and content to monopolistic, private journal and database providers that then sell us our own content back to us at exorbitant prices. And I’m also thinking of humanities scholars’ general complicity with mismatched demands between what we know might really benefit scholarship and open inquiry and the public good versus what our disciplines ask early-career scholars to produce — and of how parochially we measure their output and impact. In many ways, I think you could turn around and look to the digital humanities not as a sign of the apocalypse but for paths out of this mess. Here’s a field that has been working for years on open access research and publication platforms, on ways to articulate and valorize work done outside of narrow, elite channels, and on how to value scholarship that’s collaborative and interdisciplinary — instead of done solo, individualistically, and only made legible and accessible to fellow academics in little subdisciplines, which is still the M. O. of the broader field. And on a conceptual level, the data- and text-analysis and visualization strand of digital humanities is pretty much all about finding ways to nuance mechanistic quantification and turn it on its head — to better value and appreciate and elevate the ineffable, not in spite of numbers and measures but through them. I mean, that’s our research field. As you know, the type of work you are talking about takes a fairly good-sized team of skilled people, which usually costs a good amount of money to put together. How is this funding typically achieved? Are universities willing to pay for DH projects despite massive cutbacks elsewhere, or is funding most likely to be found from external sources? It’s actually always been a mix of external grant funding and institutional investment. And grants have typically been project-based, but our funders (both public and private) are now increasingly and rightly interested in issues of sustainability and interinstitutional collaboration and reuse — trying to invest more wisely over time and prevent the reinvention of too many wheels. They want to help motivate scholars to build on each other’s work. When it comes to internal, institutional investment, it’s unevenly applied, of course, depending on the focus and ambitions and resources of any given university or college. Of course there’s some stuff that should just be there now, for everyone, provided by institutions — general computing support as a given, like plumbing. But just like you wouldn’t question why not every institution chooses to fund a top-notch art history program, or German department, it’s no surprise that some schools have built amazing DH programs and others haven’t. One thing I think it’s cool to notice is how, in the United States, anyway, the longest-standing and best-respected institutions for digital humanities work are public ones, including some under-resourced land-grant institutions that saw the potential early on — not the wealthier and high-status private universities. DH has its Ivies-come-lately. Richard Jean So also noted the leading role of large public institutions in the digital humanities. Of course, these are still R1 schools we are talking about. What do we do about less-funded institutions or liberal arts colleges? How do we make the digital humanities playing field more even? Or should we even try? Oh, that’s a great question, and kind of a dangerous one, in that it tempts me to say something I know could be easily misconstrued — which is that I’d hate to see a completely uniform landscape here. (I’ll explain why in a minute.) But yes, resource disparities are real, and painfully felt. Possibly the greatest of them is not the most visible, like cluster hires and expensive equipment or gleaming new spaces for DH work. It has to do with time: the amount of time that librarians and tech staff and scholars across the board are given to devote to contemplation and learning new things, and to developing productive collaborations with each other as peers, which doesn’t happen instantly and is absolutely essential to creating a healthy research team. And that’s a need at every institution. But honestly, I see a lot of the most creative and provocative and publicly engaged DH scholarship and practice coming from smaller and less wealthy institutions these days — specifically from places that seem to me less concerned about trying to match the scale of projects and the style of practices that you may see in the larger labs and centers, and more about building on the things they know they’re richer in. Sort of embracing their constraints as part of the operating system. And a lot of these riches I’m talking about are relational: the closer involvement you see in liberal arts colleges with students as co-creators and with the teaching mission of the institution; sometimes a better relationship with the towns and cities in which they are physically located, or — as in the case of, say, HBCUs — a more focused and credible relationship with the broader, distributed communities they engage with; and very often, whether by virtue of size or the necessity for collaboration in a more constrained environment, you see a healthier set of relationships among faculty, staff, and administrators at smaller schools. There’s a lot for a big, R1 institution to envy right now in the way DH plays out elsewhere. You talked earlier about the line between those who make and those who use, which could be applied to the line that has frequently been drawn in the digital humanities between those who code and those who don’t. Do you think full engagement with the digital humanities requires programming skills, and if so, should programming become a requirement for humanities students? I guess I did gesture at that, in talking about the tensions that have arisen around defining the digital humanities. And “programming” or “coding” is so broad a concept and differently understood, across this community, as to become almost meaningless. It rapidly loses specificity. Therefore we’ve had a lot of tussles about this among people who actually agree but are speaking at cross-purposes. That said, I do think that students of the humanities should be required to take a steady look under the hood of digital media. We’re doing them a disservice if we’re only teaching them to operate or contemplate these platforms from the outside — or worse, if we’re pretending like there’s no difference between new media and old. I’d say the same thing about someone studying 18th- and 19th-century literature, or TV. Time spent in a letterpress shop or in the studio would be invaluable. We also hear quite a bit about the significant underrepresentation of women and minorities across digital fields, including the digital humanities. I know your own work touches upon this disparity as seen in both those who practice and those who are the subject of digital humanities research. Is there a remedy to this? That’s true. In terms of participation, it’s an ongoing problem that has its roots way back in K-12 education and gaming and pop culture, which is where — not just girls and people of color — but anybody who doesn’t present as the stereotypical cis hetero young white male who is assertive in STEM classes and tolerant of depictions of casual violence may have a hard time seeing herself in technology for the long haul. Too many people have a hard time finding a nurturing environment in which to build the skills that will one day lead to significant work in DH — but movements like Black Girls Code, or Teen Tech Girls in my own hometown, are making a difference. My 9-year-old daughter recently told me that shaking the hand of the woman who runs systems engineering for NASA’s Mars missions was “the greatest thing that ever happened to her.” So a lot of it is about having visible role models. Now, in terms of diversity and representation in the subject matter of the digital humanities, there has actually long been a clear and thoughtful thread of work in DH concerned with remediation of the archives of underrepresented groups and the use of digital tools to get at questions of alterity. I’ve seen the variety and volume of that work increase in recent years as the field itself has become more diverse and, in some ways, more inclusive. (Those are not the same thing.) It has also become increasingly sophisticated, as more humanities scholars are learning from information scientists who study how cultural bias is embedded in algorithms and databases, or from curators and anthropologists who have worked with indigenous communities to repatriate collections or organize and describe them in more appropriate ways. You have spoken about the library and its crucial role in digital projects already, but can you expand a little to discuss the future of DH locations — namely, does the future of digital work lie in individual departments or libraries? Do you have an opinion on the best physical place for digital scholarship, and what does this say about its future role in the university? There’s a lot to be said for the academic research library as an interdisciplinary corporeal space as well as a conceptual one, a virtual lab. It’s a place where everybody on campus is welcome, so a lot of fruitful interchange and cross-pollination can happen there. I know I’ve been involved in a number of projects over the years that would not have gotten started but for serendipitous hallway conversations in a library. The funny thing is that it’s not always the most slick and beautiful, well-designed open spaces that attract people to the degree that they want to stay and put down roots and get in the position to have those conversations. Dedicated office space for interprofessional DH project teams has the desired effect. It’s probably easy to think that a shift to digital work means that place and space matter less. But even if many of the resources they use are online, digital humanities scholars still need to live alongside physical library collections — especially rare and unique materials, but the “medium-rare” books, too — and in easy, regular contact with librarians and programmers. They need to get comfortable and settle in physically so they can open up intellectually, particularly when the work itself crosses boundaries. Some library design and renovation projects that overemphasize multipurpose or flexible, nomadic space really miss this point. The architecture is inspiring-looking — and vacant. I used to be able to judge the health of the intellectual community of our graduate fellows at the Scholars’ Lab — a wildly interdisciplinary bunch — by the level of noise and grubbiness in the grad lounge. You have also talked a little about the potential of digital work to engage the public. But do you think the general public understands the term “digital humanities” or, more broadly, the digital work being done in the humanities (if at all)? I don’t think they need to, or at least I’m not concerned about recognition of the term or even a lot of reflection on our projects as DH projects. I’d rather people get excited about the humanities content itself — the historical datasets they can explore, the art that they now have direct access to, or the new discoveries and fascinating methods that they hear about in the press. We’re finding new archaeological sites, reading manuscripts that were thought to be illegible, discovering historical trends in art and literature, and just plain putting things online for straightforward reading and enjoyment or for data analysis in ways never thought possible before. I’d much rather people (and by people I mean everyone from my kids’ age to my grandparents’ age) start thinking about how to apply digital humanities methods to problems or histories that matter to them, personally. And that’s happening. Part of public access is also made possible through public intellectualism, which according to many (including Nicholas Kristof in The New York Times) is in decline. What role, if any, do you think digital work plays? Could the digital humanities (or the digital in the humanities) be a much-needed bridge between the academy and the public, or is this perhaps expecting too much of a discipline? It might be asking a lot of any one discipline (if you consider DH a discipline) and even more of a loose band of practitioners from multiple professions who are still sewing their own sails while the ship’s underway — which is more how I see this community. But again: The publication platforms, the new datasets, the analytic and visualization tools, the digital megaphones the field is producing and refining — those become more robust and available to humanities scholars across all disciplines, and to journalists and writers inside and outside the academy, every day. To conclude, I would like to ask you to look back at the field. In my interview with Franco Moretti, he pointed out to me — and he was right — that all my questions focus on the future of the digital in the humanities. Perhaps it’s a sign of my own optimism or perhaps it reflects a certain anticipatory tone that is used in media and DH circles. But can you speak to what you think the digital in the humanities has accomplished so far? Well, I could talk more about the arts and humanities material that’s now online and open for interpretation and public enjoyment, or about specific discoveries and the tools and systems we’re experimenting with for generating insight — or I could go into how digital work has helped broaden the career paths for emerging scholars — but I feel like all that’s adequately understood, so I actually want to take Franco’s prerogative and pose a question back to you! Is that okay? Sure, go ahead. One thing I noticed about your questions is that, while they are definitely forward-looking, they kind of run in a channel in which the humanities is an academic enterprise, concerned with its own disciplinarity, firmly embedded in the university, and focused — or at least I’ve taken you to mean — focused on fairly traditional departments and subject areas. Is that fair to say? If so, why do you think that is? Is there something about the “digital humanities” that makes us think we know what that latter word should be and do, and it’s just the digital that’s the modifier, up for grabs? This is a fair question, and one I don’t know I can fully answer. For me, these questions stemmed from my own curiosities, and are, of course, a reflection of my position and education within the academy. They are also a reflection of my interviewees, who, for this series, are largely people within the academy. Laura Mandell talked about these two terms being in an endless feedback loop with one another, which is an image I very much like and troubles the assumption that we know what the humanities are. I suppose as the newer entity, though, the digital is the term we wrestle with in thinking about its relationship to a discipline that many of us have existed and worked within for many years. This isn’t to say it’s right. I think it’s a means of making the ambiguity of these two giant terms a little easier to deal with. I do think the digital should trouble our understanding of the humanities and that the humanities should trouble our understanding of the digital. How is it that you grapple with the juxtaposition of these two terms? I like that! I think Laura’s right about the feedback loop, and absolutely agree with your sense of mutual “trouble” between the two domains. The fact that both of them are advancing, themselves, while simultaneously orbiting around each other like a kind of double star — the humanities on the trajectory of what they can mean and become in a digital age, on the one side, and technology with how it is continually inflected by human lives and understandings on the other — is, I think, why I’ve found this an endlessly fascinating field. FOR AT LEAST THE PAST DECADE, the term “digital humanities” (DH) has captured the imagination and the ire of scholars across American universities. Supporters of the field, which melds computer science with hermeneutics, champion it as the much needed means to shake up and expand methods of traditional literary interpretation; for most outspoken critics, it is a new fad that symbolizes the neoliberal bean-counting destroying American higher education. Somewhere in the middle of these two extremes lies a vast and varied body of work that utilizes and critically examines digital tools in the pursuit of humanistic study. This field is large and increasingly indefinable even by those in its midst. In fact, “digital humanities” seems astoundingly inappropriate for an area of study that includes, on one hand, computational research, digital reading and writing platforms, digital pedagogy, open-access publishing, augmented texts, and literary databases, and on the other, media archaeology and theories of networks, gaming, and wares both hard and soft. As Franco Moretti said to me in the first of these interviews: “‘digital humanities’ means nothing.” Richard Jean So, assistant professor in modern and contemporary American culture at the University of Chicago, echoes Moretti’s sentiments. He is working with members of his academic cohort to expand what the digital humanities can and should do. So’s work in DH, although brief in number of years, has already had substantial impact and can be found in journals such as boundary 2, Representations, and Critical Inquiry. I first came across So’s computational work on race, language, and power dynamics through a not-to-be-circulated (but yet still was) conference paper. So’s research area is still new ground for DH and as such provides an exciting perspective for this series, which aims to uncover, through conversations with both leading practitioners in the field and vocal critics of the field’s impact on humanistic inquiry, some surprising lines of overlap, as well as outright disagreement. But at its heart, this series is a means to explore the intersection of the digital and the humanities, and this intersection’s impact on research and teaching, American higher education, and the increasingly tenuous connection between the ivory tower of elite institutions and the general public. To each of these topics Richard Jean So brings a perspective grounded in both his expertise in postcolonial and minority studies and his knowledge of quantitative methods, which he uses to reapproach questions of cultural transnationalism, race and representation, and minority discourse. The result is an exciting challenge to the scholarly perception of US minority literature as well as the presumed purview of DH as being concerned with only dead, white males. Part of this expansion work has involved the exhausting task of building a definitive 20th-century corpus of American novels, which will help pave the way for digital humanists to computationally examine a larger and previously unavailable body of literary work. Throughout our conversation, So’s passion for digital tools and methods is evident; yet, this is always tempered by a critical postcolonial training that manifests itself in his first monograph, Transpacific Community, forthcoming from Columbia University Press. Taken together, So’s varied methodological approaches — computational, cultural, political, archival, at times in tension with one another — reveal some refreshing perspectives on the digital in the humanities and its future within the academy. ¤ MELISSA DINSMAN: How did you first come to enter what I am broadly going to call the “digital” field? RICHARD JEAN SO: My original academic interests and training were in postcolonial studies and race and ethnicity. I went to Columbia for graduate school to work with people like Edward Said and Gauri Viswanathan. I was really drawn to their work because they were able to combine theoretical questions and frameworks with close reading along with archival materials and evidence. I found this approach really compelling, and I was drawn to how they were able to map out historically what they described as cultural systems. For example, Said often refers to “Orientalism” as a kind of pattern or system. So my dissertation and first book worked very much in that mode; I thought of it as being in dialogue with postcolonial studies. Through the process of writing my first book, I started recognizing some of the limitations of that approach in terms of the evidence close reading can provide, and what even an archive can provide. They have certain constraints; I was excited by the idea of having much more evidence to strengthen the claims around the systematicity of culture — or culture as a kind of pattern — at a larger scale. So my digital work is really an outgrowth of an original training and disposition that I would describe as Saidian, or postcolonial, but then trying to think about that work with new kinds of evidence and how core claims in those areas could be bolstered. So when did your computational work begin? It was 2012, my second year at my job at the University of Chicago, which was a half generation behind people like Ted Underwood and Ben Schmidt. Once I had a good handle on my core training and my first book, I felt that I was in a position to expand my expertise and learn new skills. Not that I had mastered close reading or archival analysis, but I felt that I was in a position to learn how to do new things. Since your work is heavily computational, is it fair to say that you would describe your research as “digital humanities”? Or do you not care about such labels? I don’t really use the term “digital” to describe what I do. Not to be a contrarian, I just find it somewhat of a vague term. I would describe the thing that points to the digital in my work as quantitative and computational. I use large amounts of data, primarily numerical, and I use empirical methods to model that material to make sense of it. Does this qualify as “digital humanities” work? I guess, in terms of the digital humanities being a catch-all term for people doing stuff with computers. I guess what I do is one version of that. I would describe myself as aligned with people using computational methods to work to resolve or address or think about humanities questions. I don’t think most of the people in my cohort care how we describe or label the work we do. I think we broadly think of ourselves as English or Literature professors doing historical and critical work. If that gets described as digital is some way, it is not very meaningful to us. So, no, I actually don’t care about the label “digital humanities.” Do you think that not caring stems from the job title itself? If you were hired in a digital humanities position instead of one in English literature, would you be more likely to care that your work is seen as aligned with the position you were hired to fill? This is a really relevant question as more people are being hired as digital humanists. I have a kind of cynical interpretation. If you are going to identify with something, you typically feel like you are going to benefit from that labeling in some way. A lot of people in my cohort were already fairly established in literary studies, and so we don’t need that cachet — if there is any cachet attached with that. We would rather let our work speak for itself than thrive on labeling. I do take your point that if you are hired in the DH field and you need to get tenure in it, then probably being identified in this field will have some kind of professional benefit. I don’t feel like I need to benefit from this new development professionally or intellectually, so I don’t care if people think I’m associated with it. Despite not identifying fully with the field’s label, do you think there are any digital or media subfields in particular that yield the most benefit to the humanities? If so, why? This is such a contentious question. I’m not going to say there is one single subfield that is most beneficial because that points to a kind of hegemony. I will say though that I find it inspiring that there is simultaneous growth in both applied computational work alongside critical media studies. I think right now there is a kind of firewall between the two fields. People are picking sides and there is a lot of hostility between them. I would say that the antagonism is ultimately good for both fields, intellectually speaking. I think we need both fields. We need people using technology to do new forms of cultural research and we need people critiquing this research and these technologies, but I think you can’t really have one without the other. I find the development of both fields concurrently — and I don’t think this simultaneous growth is an accident — to be good for both sides and whatever this thing we are doing is called. People often speak of digital work (and more frequently the digital humanities) as a means of making the humanities relevant in the 21st-century university. Do you think this statement is a fair assessment of digital work and its purpose? Do you think it is fair to the humanities? The assumption of the question is that the humanities are somehow not relevant or increasingly less relevant, and I don’t buy into that formulation. I think people who are excessively enthusiastic about the digital humanities take those as premises — that the humanities are increasingly less relevant and the digital will save it. I absolutely do not endorse this position. I think it’s a naïve one. People who are doing intelligent and thoughtful computational work in the humanities do not believe that the humanities are becoming inherently less relevant and they do not see themselves as saving it, so I would not characterize my work or my cohort’s work as believing that. I want to make sure to dispel that notion. I think this characterization is unfair to thoughtful, applied digital humanities and the humanities in general. I’d like to turn now to another contentious claim, this one articulated by media scholar Richard Grusin in his C21 post titled “The Dark Side of Digital Humanities.” In this post, Grusin draws connections between the emergence of DH and the increased “neoliberalism and corporatization of higher education.” Do you think such a comparison has merit? Is there something about the digital humanities’ desire to produce that creates an alignment with neoliberal thinking? So I have a lot to say about this. I think what Grusin says is true. I am sympathetic to it. Most people I know working in applied computational work believe this, so as a critique it is not something with which we would quarrel. To me, though, I am less sympathetic when it comes to the generalness and abstractness of the critique. I am not quite sure what to do with it on its terms. What interests me about the critique is: What do we do next? If the force of the critique is that everyone doing work with computers should stop and we should go back to only doing close reading and historicism, then I am not sympathetic, because the premise then is that the problem of DH is that we have lots of grant funding, we use computers and numbers, and therefore nothing good can come from that. By this logic, nothing good can come from the sciences or social sciences, which is not true. If the critique is that we should be more aware of this, that it is an enlightenment point, then I am very sympathetic. I think all my collaborators are aware of this and take it very seriously. To us though, the question becomes: What do we do with this critique? How do we then do a scientific, applied version of the humanities that is critical of neoliberalism, critical of the corporatization of higher education? I think this is where we are headed. We are using these new methods, which, again, can be implicated in neoliberalism, to critique things like gender and racial inequality. I’m not sure if there is a real antagonism between these positions. Again, everyone I know and have worked with in this field is aware of this critique and generally sympathetic to it, but for us the next step is what can we do with this critique, practically, to produce new knowledge. So you have already started to anticipate my next question, which deals with the large amounts of funding needed by and granted to digital humanities projects. I think it is fair to say that to put together a solid digital humanities research group, a fair amount of funding is needed. How is this funding typically achieved? Are universities willing to pay for DH projects despite massive cutbacks elsewhere, or is funding most likely to be found from external sources? I want to be careful with this response because it immediately opens up charges of neoliberalism. The first thing I will say is that there is a lot of enthusiasm and excitement about funding the digital humanities or computational work in the humanities from donors, alumni, universities, federal grant organizations, ACLS, NEH, etc. I immediately want to qualify that though by saying that I’m aware that this situation can be dubbed “neoliberal,” in that the digital humanities is participating in ramping up the scientization of research knowledge. I am actually sympathetic to this critique. I am not uncritical about where the money comes from. But again, to me the question is, do people who critique DH funding suggest then that we give back the money and don’t do anything in this field? I believe that there is a way to draw on all this energy and money to do work that can be critical and socially engaged and that is what we are extremely focused on. It is not a utopian situation. I agree that money is being pulled from departments such as philosophy and classics, and somewhat being redirected to DH-type research. But to say that we can’t take this money and do computational work that is philosophical or critical is a deep fallacy. I want to say one final thing about this. This funding problem is not entirely a poor/rich university divide either. There are actually more DH centers popping up at state schools like Nebraska and Florida. So I think the notion that DH is just the privilege of rich private universities is also a fallacy. There has been more support at the state university level. The one thing I will say though is that it does punish small liberal arts colleges and community colleges, so there is a kind of rich-poor dynamic at work, but it is different than what you think it would be. It is really state schools — granted R1 schools — that are leading the way with funding. Moving from the question of a poor/rich divide, the digital humanities have also opened up divisions between those who code and those who don’t. Do you think full engagement with the digital humanities requires programming skills, and if so, should programming become a requirement for humanities students? Whether you code or not depends on your project. If you design your project to be a critique of media and it is critical and interpretive, then you don’t need to know how to code to do that. If you have a project that is computational in nature, then I think learning how to code is a good idea. There are a couple things I want to say about coding as a humanist. The first is that if you want to work with data, or cite data, to me it is untenable to just hire or collaborate with someone in stats or computer science. To me, this actually seems antihumanist because you don’t understand what you are doing. This would be like hiring someone to go to the archive to do your research for you. To do a critical, applied version of DH you should learn how to code, not because coding is a good practical skill, but because it is just solid humanities research practice to understand your materials and how they are made. The other thing is that no one in my cohort is saying that we should replace a foreign language requirement with a coding requirement. That is a fallacy. No one I know has ever said that. Coding is really different than learning a foreign language. Personally my work is comparative. I am a comparativist in Chinese literature; I spent seven years studying Chinese and think that every student should learn a foreign language. Coding is a different type of language acquisition, but I think it can supplement foreign language acquisition. It is a language that a lot of people use in the world and so I feel that the call to resist learning coding a priori is problematic in so far as we should encourage our students to learn as many different kinds of languages, artificial and natural, because it’s empowering. We want to empower students to know how the world works; if 90 percent of the world is run by computers and technology, then learning how to code cannot be a bad thing intellectually. I want to change direction substantially now to discuss a problem that is pretty pervasive across tech fields, including the digital humanities, namely the significant underrepresentation of women and minorities. I know your own work touches upon this disparity as seen in both those who practice and those who are the subject of digital humanities research. Is there a remedy to this? How has your own work tried to challenge this lack? I want to say from the jump that the situation is a complete catastrophe. It is untenable, unacceptable, and a total disaster. Everyone I work with on the applied side is extremely aware of this situation and it’s completely unsustainable. So anyone who accuses the DH community of being oblivious or insensitive to this problem is completely wrong. We are in a bad cycle in which the field is dominated by white men and so the work coming out of it tends to be of a certain sort, which then discourages minorities and women from being more interested in the field. People that are already in the field — Ted Underwood, Andrew Piper, Mark Algee-Hewitt, Hoyt Long, and myself included — basically see that it is through collaboration and pedagogy that the field can be diversified. In our Intro to Programming in the Humanities at Chicago, it is actually women and students of color who make up the majority. The question becomes how do we keep these students interested. In terms of pedagogy, the interest levels are very high among minorities and women. So I am very hopeful for the future in this regard. At the same time, in terms of collaboration, there are a lot of women and minorities that are interested in what this work can do, but they don’t want to put all their time into retraining. In the short term, an approach to addressing this question is that we have to train students of a diverse background and begin collaborations. In fact I have a project that reflects a possible longer-term strategy. We are building a US novel database at Chicago and have partnered with Maryemma Graham at the University of Kansas, who runs the Project on the History of Black Writing. Graham is a distinguished African-American scholar and has been enthusiastically working with us to expand this corpus along racial lines and expanding its possibilities for research. So I am sympathetic to this critique as an incitement to do more collaborations. I am less sympathetic though when the critique is meant to say that everything we do is bullshit and flawed. This is an ungenerous and unfair depiction of the field and can have the impact of actually discouraging women and minorities from learning how to code when they want to. You are actually disempowering students when you say, “Look how racist this field is, don’t bother going into it.” If you want the field to be better, you need to encourage diverse students to enter it. Can you speak a little bit about how your own computational research interacts with minority literature? Yes, thanks for bringing this up. To be fair to the critics, DH research has focused too much on white-male writing, like Victorian literature. The problem here is that the data has not been readily available for 20th-century projects. My own work, and the corpus building I have done, is precisely to deal with this problem. But it is only recently that we have gotten this data and explored these possibilities. I actually think computational methods are really well suited for racial and gender critique, specifically meaning that if you want to track inequality and power differentials, working empirically — working at scale — can really flesh out these narratives of subjection and inequality. For example, the slogan “the one percent” is actually a quantitative description, and I think it is in part very powerful because of that. Computational methods can very much be an ally to the project of social critique and the critique of power. In these final few questions, I’d like to talk about the relationship between the general public and the academy. To start with, how do you think the general public understands the term “digital humanities” or, more broadly, the digital work being done in the humanities (if at all)? I would say that the public probably understands it largely through representations in the media. But this is also unfortunate because DH has become more of a symbol for the changing humanities. The public discourse around DH is reductive because journalists either claim that DH is the savior of the humanities or they say it is the destruction of the humanities. Both are simplistic versions of what is happening in the academy. If you read newspaper articles in the 1980s about deconstruction, you can find similarly naïve or simplistic descriptions. My problem with this is when academics start repeating the terms of the debate from the media. I do think those who are critical of the digital humanities are sometimes not reading the work that people like myself or Andrew Piper or Marissa Gemma actually do. They are actually more responding to representations in the media rather than what is being done on the ground. I think the public understands DH as a symbol for what is happening in the humanities and that it’s dangerous when we academics also engage DH as a symbol for whether or not you are for or against technology and computers. You seem to be anticipating my follow-up about public intellectualism and the academy. According to many scholars and journalists, we live in an age that has seen a decline in the public intellectual (as Nicholas Kristof opined in The New York Times as recently as last year). What role, if any, do you think digital work plays? Could the digital humanities (or the digital in the humanities) be a much needed bridge between the academy and the public, or is this perhaps expecting too much of a discipline? The first thing I want to address is that it is not a priori that public writing or engaging with the public is either a good or a bad thing. Some people will say that public writing is a kind of dilution or pandering; I don’t believe that. I think that translating our scholarship to a broader public audience through newspapers and journalists is a good thing, when done intelligently. Second, I do believe that, especially in literary studies, our communication with the general public has been poor and we have been underrepresented and misrepresented. The baseline is that the relationship between the humanities, or literary studies, and the public has been poor and could be improved. I believe we can take steps to make the relationship better and that this is desirable. In fact, Andrew Piper and I have started a public writing project called “Culture After Computation” where we take work we are doing in the academic field and write more accessible versions. We have successfully pitched articles and published them in places like Slate and The New Republic, and we have something forthcoming in The Atlantic as well. We were really surprised by how interested and open editors have been to a kind of public writing that mixes critical scholarship with ideas supported by quantitative evidence. Some might see this as pandering to the public. I’ve found to the contrary that the public is largely intelligent and speaking to it is not an inherently bad thing. We don’t think that the only point of this work should be to speak to the public, but we do think that some of our academic work can have a broader interest. We are translating difficult, complex ideas around culture and power to a broader audience and speaking to more people, and getting more people involved in the conversation is not a bad thing. Okay, final question. In my interview with Franco Moretti, he pointed out to me — and rightfully so — that all my questions focus on the future of the digital in the humanities. Perhaps it’s a sign of my own optimism or perhaps it reflects a certain anticipatory tone that is used in media and DH circles. My last question, however, is going to ask that you look backward and speak to what you think the digital in the humanities has accomplished so far. As a younger person in the field, I don’t like the gesture of looking back. I find it problematic for someone to justify a field by saying to people, “Look how great my field is because of all these accomplishments.” If you are in a field and the accomplishments don’t speak for themselves, then you have more work to do. It is a position of potential weakness or insecurity to constantly say, “Look what we’ve done.” There is certainly a place for that, but in trying to build out the field, this looking back can be problematic when done in a defensive way. If our work and accomplishments are not instantly recognizable outside the field, then we have to do more work. So I would definitely say that I am more future minded. It isn’t obvious yet that DH is here to stay, so rather than meet critiques with a “look what we’ve done” mentality, we need to go back to our books and computers and do better work until we don’t have to answer this question any more. FOR AT LEAST THE PAST DECADE, the term “digital humanities” (DH) has captured the imagination and the ire of scholars across American universities. Supporters of the field, which melds computer science with hermeneutics, champion it as the much needed means to shake up and expand methods of traditional literary interpretation; for most outspoken critics, it is a new fad that symbolizes the neoliberal bean-counting destroying American higher education. Somewhere in the middle of these two extremes lies a vast and varied body of work that utilizes and critically examines digital tools in the pursuit of humanistic study. This field is large and increasingly indefinable even by those in its midst. In fact, “digital humanities” seems astoundingly inappropriate for an area of study that includes, on one hand, computational research, digital reading and writing platforms, digital pedagogy, open-access publishing, augmented texts, and literary databases, and on the other, media archaeology and theories of networks, gaming, and wares both hard and soft. As Franco Moretti said to me in the first of these interviews: “‘digital humanities’ means nothing.”  Laura Mandell acknowledges that the digital humanities is a varied field, but throughout our conversation, challenged this perception of indefinability. Mandell, who serves as both a full professor of English and the director of the Initiative for Digital Humanities, Media, and Culture at Texas A&M, has had an expansive career in the digital humanities. She describes the field as part of a symbiotic relationship with the traditional humanities, with both the digital and the humanities collaborating and confronting each other in an endless feedback loop. Though seemingly only a semantic difference, Mandell’s definition gets to the very heart of this series and its exploration of the digital’s impact on humanistic inquiry. Through conversations with both leading practitioners in the field and vocal critics, this series is a means to explore the intersection of the digital and the humanities, and its impact on research and teaching, American higher education, and the increasingly tenuous connection between the ivory tower of elite institutions and the general public. Mandell, who began her exploration of the digital and its potential impact on the humanities in the early 1990s, has accumulated numerous poignant anecdotes pertaining to the evolution of the field and its current place within the academy. Throughout our conversation, she generously shares these stories, mixing the humorous with the frustrating, the absurd with a determination to keep moving forward. These are the stories that only a leader in the field could amass. Mandell is one of those rare academics who has carved success for herself in two distinct fields — first as an 18th-century scholar (Misogynous Economies, 1999) and then as a digital one (Breaking the Book, 2015). But rather than keep these two specialties separate, she has remarkably combined them through her formation of the Poetess Archive and 18thConnect. She is a vocal supporter for female inclusion in all digital fields and actively advocates this position through her research. I was lucky enough to see this in action at a talk Mandell recently gave in which she subtly, yet powerfully, connected the field’s sexism to insufficient search returns and biased data sets — not an easy feat. This expertise, sharp critique, and varied interests inhabit each of her answers in this interview and offer practical insight — more than 20 years in the making — into this vast field. ¤ MELISSA DINSMAN: How did you first come to enter what I am broadly going to call the “digital” field? LAURA MANDELL: In 1994, I went to the NASSR [North American Society for the Study of Romanticism] conference at Duke, and Stuart Curran was on a panel talking about putting things up on the internet. At the time, I was the panel’s materials person and I had brought a packet with me, which included a chronology of the Romantic era that I had made as a graduate student to help me keep historical events and names straight. Alan Liu — a pioneer in the digital humanities and creator of the online table of contents for humanists called “Voice of the Shuttle” — was in the audience and had received the packet. Alan suggested that we put the chronology online, to which I agreed. But working with Alan, I didn’t think he should have to do all the coding, so I learned HTML and continued on from there, later learning TEI and XML. I was also put on a lot of digital humanities committees, most notably in 2004 when Jerome McGann started NINES and needed a steering committee. From here I expanded my coding knowledge and created the TEI-encoded Poetess Archive and my digital career has grown organically from there. So then do you consider your work in the digital field to be “digital humanities”? If not, do you care? So the digital humanities was originally called “humanities computing.” And humanities computing often involved stylometrics, so I usually thought of myself as a digital editor more than anything, because I was working in TEI and not using programming languages to algorithmically analyze texts. With the publication of the Blackwell Companion to Digital Humanities by Susan Schreibman, Ray Siemens, and John Unsworth, the common name for the field has switched from humanities computing to its now better-known name. And the field has since taken off. I am not so interested in participating in the digital humanities debates — although you will see in the answers to my questions that I very much am engaging with some of them. The real reason for me for talking about the digital humanities is that we need to realize the humanities never were the humanities. They are the print humanities and they are conditioned by print. So the question the term “digital humanities” poses is: How must humanities disciplines change if we are no longer working in a print world? This question, to me, is crucial. It is an intellectual question. And the question being proposed is: What happens to the humanities when digital methodologies are applied to them or when they start to interrogate digital methodologies? Both of these questions are crucial and that is what this term — “digital humanities” — keeps front and center. So you have mentioned stylometrics, text encoding, and computation, but are there any digital or media subfields in particular that you think yield the most benefit to the humanities? I do. Part of the reason I am so interested in working on and thinking about infrastructure is that there is a fundamental difference between scholars going to the archive and reading through materials, and all of the archive being made available digitally. There are, of course, only things you can do by reading, and the book — especially the paperback — is a fantastic technology. However, if you take a look at the print critical edition, you can see that at times the footnotes threaten to obscure the text itself, especially poems. Even in critical editions that have provenance and variants in the apparatus, the apparatus is difficult — if not impossible — for the average human being to read. The critical edition broke the book format. It simply doesn’t work in print format. So I think that the TEI-encoded digital edition promises to fix this problem in some way. It hasn’t yet. We still need some really good critical edition software, but it is getting there and the Whitman archive is probably the best example. Another area of importance is research into data visualizations. With everything in our cultural heritage being digitized the question is: What can you do that you couldn’t do before when you have that much digital material? One of the first things you have to be able to do is to adequately visualize search returns and data mining results. Visualization is a way to amplify cognition, but it is not easy to do. We need to figure out not only how to visualize our data, but also how to read it. We know how to read texts, but we don’t know how to read statistics or data visualizations and I think some of the ways in which data mining results are being read — even at the Stanford Literary Lab — are not correct. There are whole fields in statistics and visual studies that we need to take advantage of. We need to get involved in learning these disciplines in order to understand what we see. As you know, people often speak of digital work (and more frequently the digital humanities) as a means of making the humanities relevant in the 21st-century university. Do you think this statement is a fair assessment of digital work and its purpose? Do you think it is fair to the humanities? I don’t think it’s fair. I think that the digital humanities at its best furthers humanities questions. I just saw this interview on television on the future of work, and one of the amazing things said, and something humanists ought to trumpet, is that to prepare for jobs in the future, which will require working with digital tools, people need a humanities background. So the humanities themselves are and have always been relevant in a profound way. I think the digital humanities can demonstrate to computer scientists and statisticians how the humanities can help them understand things. Insofar as the digital humanities can insert itself into discussions on computational methods and can insert the humanities into that discussion, it gives people a sense of the value that the humanities already have. So it seems that one of the values of the digital humanities to the broader humanities is that it enables humanists to speak to other disciplines in a shared language and by doing so articulates the value of humanist inquiry.  Yes. In fact, when I first started in the field I would go to the computer science department at Miami University and introduce myself as working with the digital, and I was met with disbelief and uncertainty. At a certain point, however, there began to be textual data, and a lot of it. And suddenly the computer scientists started knocking on my door and asking for me to speak to their department about data — textual data that humanists know well, but was new to the field of computer science. Here at Texas A&M, I am currently collaborating with a natural language processing professor in computer science to work on analyzing plot structure. For me it’s important for the study of novels. For her it’s important for natural language processing. We have roughly 100 years of narratological analysis that we can marshal to help people understand things. Some of it is structuralist and some of it is archetypal. But we have a lot of skills and knowledge that can really help the computer sciences and textual people who are trying to analyze Twitter streams, etc. Another topic that is hotly debated in the digital field concerns the ties the digital humanities have to neoliberalism. In a C21 post titled “The Dark Side of the Digital Humanities,” media scholar Richard Grusin famously draws connections between the emergence of DH and the increased “neoliberalism and corporatization of higher education.” Do you think such a comparison has merit? Is there something about the digital humanities’ desire to produce that creates an alignment with neoliberal thinking?  This is really a sore spot for me. Grusin starts the published version of “The Dark Side of the Digital Humanities” with the line, “I am not now, nor have I ever been, a digital humanist.” And then he goes on the blame the digital humanities for adjunctification. In my book I mention that the humanities were already becoming precarious in the 1970s. The MLA has done research on this and the problem of adjunctification is not to be laid at the door of DH. But there is something else that is going on here that is more important and intellectually interesting. That opening gambit is really disingenuous because Grusin works for a neoliberal corporation, if that is what the university is. What I mean to say by that is that Grusin is not being sufficiently skeptical. If you want to attack neoliberal corporatization then let’s look at the conditions under which you yourself are speaking. For example, Richard Grusin, like all faculty, has moved from university to university marketing his own cultural capital to get a higher salary and is in a position where he is using and relying on neoliberal corporate money. The same thing happens in a lot of critiques of DH and a lot of these scholars are not sufficiently questioning their own institutional position and the position that makes possible their speaking at that moment. People attack the racism of UNIX systems, which is absolutely right to do, but we also need talk about the racism of print, in which these critics are writing. So nobody is being sufficiently skeptical. What I would say to the “dark side” people is that if you want to figure out neoliberal corporatization of the university, first look at your own institutional conditions. First interrogate your own position. And then, let’s start putting all the pieces together. I don’t object to critique itself, but I do object to critique that says, “you are part of the neoliberal corporatization, and we are not.” By using the “I’m an outsider” stance, you opt out of crucial discussions with the administrators, board of regents, government officials, and venders that we need to be participating in. Of course one of the subsets of the neoliberal complaint has to do with money. To put together a solid digital humanities research group, a fair amount of funding is needed. In your experience, how is this funding typically achieved? Are universities willing to pay for DH projects despite massive cutbacks elsewhere, or is funding most likely to be found from external sources? I do think the digital humanities is capable of attracting funding to the humanities in a number of different ways. Universities, outside funding agencies, businesses, and donors don’t really know how to fund the humanities. They know they care about it, but they don’t really know how to fund it. They can give money to a professor who takes a leave to write a book, but that is just not a very compelling way to spend your money to promote research. And I think this is for good reason. One-offs are just not impactful enough. So a lot of the donors and external funders I deal with are not just interested in a published book, but in a database that will allow many people to write books. Publishing the source materials and making them available to citizen scholars and professional scholars alike is very interesting to outside funders. This is a way to make the humanities broadly available. So when digital humanists show a desire to create something that will allow multiple people to conduct scholarly dialogue, the funding request is more compelling. In my own experience funding methods have been diverse. When I worked at Miami University there was an opportunity to get presidential funds. I was part of a grant team that proposed building a humanities center with a digital center component. As the application moved through the upper administration, it began to be called a “digital humanities” center, rather than just a humanities center. We got the money, a traditional humanist was put in charge of the center, and the result was that a traditional humanities center — without the DH component — was built. So in this example, the digital and traditional humanities were in a way competing for money. Texas A&M, on the other hand, already had a well-funded humanities center, so when I came in, nobody saw me as taking their money. And I wasn’t. I came in to start a digital humanities center that was funded by the Provost’s office and the VP of Research. I was taking money that otherwise would have gone to the sciences and not the humanities. But I think this question is really institutionally specific and to generalize across all institutions is dangerous. In the past there has been a line drawn in the digital humanities between those who code and those who don’t. Do you think full engagement with the digital humanities requires programming skills, and if so, should programming become a requirement for humanities students? This has been hotly debated ever since Stephen Ramsay made that statement. I do think people need to have experience, if not with coding, then with infrastructure development, with making things work. There is a critique of DH, primarily from Wendy Chun, that says we should be making code break, that the radical thing to do is to disrupt. If you are involved with the making of a tool or with infrastructure you are not going to sign on to that program because you are trying to make something work. The term “work” is loaded. Is work a neoliberal production term? I don’t know. I think there are other ways to look at work. Michel Foucault has said that you don’t analyze who has power or where power is held, you ask how does power work. It is this kind of “work” that I am interested in. The notion of working is crucial. So someone involved in the digital humanities who actually engages with production — knows how hard it is to make things work, knows how hard it is to design software — cannot so easily make such blanket statements like all software is ideology. This is, again, to deny one’s own position. These blanket statements about making things break come from not being immersed in this world of making and not thinking about making in many ways. There is a wonderful critical making movement led by Kari Kraus, which is about thinking about ideological questions as you are making things work. But just breaking them isn’t the answer. We also hear quite a bit about the significant underrepresentation of women and minorities across digital fields, including the digital humanities. I know your own work touches upon this disparity as seen in both those who practice and those who are the subject of digital humanities research. Is there a remedy to this? How has your own work tried to challenge this lack? There is severe underrepresentation. An article just came out saying there is no underrepresentation of women in the digital humanities, only in tech fields, and there was a really strong reaction against that. There is undeniable institutionalized sexism across STEM and the tech fields. I recently took a statistics course and the course textbook and class began with analyzing a data set composed of male versus female mathematical GRE scores and how much lower the female mathematical GRE scores are. You start taking that class and you’re a woman, the first thing you’ve been told when you walk in the door is, “You’re going to stink at this.” That is part of this culture. I do, however, think the major digital humanists in my field are women — Julia Flanders, Bethany Nowviskie, Melissa Terras, Susan Schreibman, and Susan Brown. They are the movers and shakers in this field and they are doing amazing work. From this perspective, the digital humanities has been more hospitable to women, but there is still a lot of work that needs to be done. There is a major problem that women are being overlooked in the field of DH, despite the fact that there are these amazing women leaders in the field. There is just this institutionalized sexism that we can’t break through. And I have this internally. I am not only blaming men for it, I too internalize it. So one of the things I am going to do to help remedy the situation is to hold a summer workshop on programming for women. It is going to have all women teachers and all women students, programming, and yoga classes. Programming and yoga — I would sign up for that! I will send you an invitation! You have spoken some about infrastructure, but I’d also like to think about physical space – namely does the future of digital work lie in individual departments or libraries? Do you have an opinion on the best physical place for digital scholarship and what does this say about its future role in the university? This is a hard question and I think there is a lot of work being done on whether digital humanities centers should be in libraries or not. I think there are a couple models for digital humanities centers. I started a center that adhered to one model, which is to have a DH center within the college of liberal arts. This model hires a professor who is both a full professor in his or her discipline and also does digital work to run a DH center. These are hard animals to find. Another model is the one that Princeton is following now, where you have a faculty director but you hire an alt-ac person to run the DH center. The faculty member is in a specific discipline, but the alt-ac person and DH center, in the Princeton example, is housed in the library. That is a great model too; in fact, it may be the better model. To me, however, the biggest problem that we confront – and nobody has solved this — is the infrastructure question. And this problem still exists whether it is in libraries or colleges. I have an amazing infrastructure system here at Texas A&M. I am running 20 VMs on four servers, but I got it by hook and crook. Across the digital humanities we have had huge infrastructure issues and nobody has solved them. Libraries are struggling to create infrastructures for what they have to deal with. And universities are trying to centralize their infrastructures, and you can’t do that with digital humanities servers. So this is a big issue and I think it really doesn’t matter where the center lives, as much as what kind of infrastructure you can develop to support big data research. I’d like to now turn to a couple questions concerning the relationship between the academy and the public, and how the digital component fits in. Do you think the general public understands the term “digital humanities” or, more broadly, the digital work being done in the humanities (if at all)? I think it is a hell of a thing to try to explain to people! In fact, I am trying to develop a degree for digital humanities, and if you call a class “digital humanities” there is not a student on earth who takes it, because they don’t know what it is. But if I call it digital publishing, then students will expect to have courses in Illustrator or Desktop Publishing. My elevator speech when people ask me about the digital humanities is, “we put Shakespeare on iPads,” and I get every kind of hostile response you can imagine. But the best definition of the digital humanities, I think, is bringing digital methods to bear on humanities research and then interrogating the digital humanities by humanities research. This is the definition I most care about and it is difficult to relate to the public. Another concern that has come up deals with public intellectualism, which many scholars and journalists alike have described as being in decline (for example, Nicholas Kristof’s New York Times essay last year). What role, if any, do you think digital work plays? Could the digital humanities (or the digital in the humanities) be a much-needed bridge between the academy and the public, or is this perhaps expecting too much of a discipline? I have a story to tell about this. I was at the digital humanities conference at Stanford one year and there was a luncheon at which Alan Liu spoke. His talk was a plea to have the digital humanities help save the humanities by broadcasting humanities work — in other words, making it public. It was a deeply moving talk. But to her credit, Julia Flanders stood up and said something along the lines of, “We don’t want to save the humanities as they are traditionally constituted.” And she is right. There are institutional problems with the humanities that need to be confronted and those same humanities have participated in criticizing the digital humanities. Digital humanists would be shooting themselves in the foot in trying to help the very humanities discipline that discredits us. In many ways Liu wasn’t addressing the correct audience, because he was speaking to those who critique DH and asking that they take that critical drive that is designed to make the world a better place and put it into forging a link with the public — making work publicly available. Habermas has said that the project of Enlightenment is unfinished until we take specialist discourses and bring them back to the public. This has traditionally been seen as a lesser thing to do in the humanities. For Habermas, it is seen as the finishing of an intellectual trajectory. This is a trajectory that we have not yet completed and it is something, I think, the digital humanities can offer. We are going to end with a question posed to me by Franco Moretti, who pointed out — and he was right — that all my questions focus on the future of the digital in the humanities. Perhaps it’s a sign of my own optimism or perhaps it reflects a certain anticipatory tone that is used in media and DH circles. But could you look backward and speak to what you think the digital in the humanities has accomplished so far? I think a lot has been accomplished, but I have been living in the digital humanities for many years now. One of the most exciting things to me was being on the NINES committee. Every meeting was mind-blowing — the things that we are looking forward to being able to do, the ways of understanding that have already opened up. I will just give you some examples. I teach XML in my sophomore “Writing About Literature” course. I have the students code poetry for metaphor and personification and repetition and all kinds of literary figures using an XML schema. I then take an XSLT and transform it into webpages, so that when you click on a highlighted colored word, a window will pop up with the literary term and the student’s interpretation. This work has an amazing impact on student writing: those who couldn’t write about literature at the beginning of the course write beautifully about it by the end. The digital realm is an opportunity for us to figure out other ways for students to learn about humanistic discourse that involves visual and physical learning. I also think that the TEI part of the digital humanities has turned people into editors and is modifying the prestige of editors in our field for the better. I think the data mining part has shown people that verbal literacy is not enough, that we need mathematical literacy as humanists. We need humanists working in, and having an impact on, tech and other industries. The digital humanities is getting graduate students into other fields of work outside of the academy where they can have substantial impact. For me, the digital humanities has a kind of energy about it which is exciting and revitalizing. FOR AT LEAST THE PAST DECADE, the term “digital humanities” (DH) has captured the imagination and the ire of scholars across American universities. Supporters of the field, which melds computer science with hermeneutics, champion it as the much needed means to shake up and expand methods of traditional literary interpretation; for most outspoken critics, it is a new fad that symbolizes the neoliberal bean-counting destroying American higher education. Somewhere in the middle of these two extremes lies a vast and varied body of work that utilizes and critically examines digital tools in the pursuit of humanistic study. This field is large and increasingly indefinable even by those in its midst. In fact, “digital humanities” seems astoundingly inappropriate for an area of study that includes, on the one hand, computational research, digital reading and writing platforms, digital pedagogy, open-access publishing, augmented texts, and literary databases, and, on the other, media archaeology and theories of networks, gaming, and wares both hard and soft. As Franco Moretti said to me in the first of these interviews: “‘digital humanities’ means nothing.”        I think this is a point with which my second interviewee, Alexander Galloway, and Moretti would find common ground. The two scholars, working on opposite coasts and in different fields, approach their digital work in the humanities in disparate ways. For Galloway, understanding digitality and media objects as critical forms that shape our understanding of, and engagement with, the world is essential for his work in the digital. In this way he is very much a media theorist. Moretti, on the other hand, is more concerned with how the digital can open up new interpretations of older media objects, specifically literature. Taken together, these two scholars epitomize what this series on the digital in the humanities as it currently exists in the US academy is fundamentally about. Through conversations with both leading practitioners in the field and vocal critics of the field’s impact on humanistic inquiry, these interviews will uncover some surprising lines of overlap as well as outright disagreement. But at its heart, this series is a means to explore the intersection of the digital and the humanities, and this intersection’s impact on research and teaching, American higher education, and the increasingly tenuous connection between the ivory tower of elite institutions and the general public. Galloway has strong opinions on each of these topics that stem from his experience as both media critic and programmer. As a professor of media, culture, and communication at NYU and the author of numerous academic texts including Protocol (2004), Gaming (2006), and The Interface Effect (2012), Galloway is very much within institutionalized academia. But as a self-proclaimed hacker and the creator of Carnivore, a data surveillance Processing library, Galloway is also outside of the academy’s ivory tower. He is both knowledgeable insider and rebellious outcast. It is this tension that drew me to his work in the first place, specifically his jointly authored The Exploit (2007) with Eugene Thacker, a text that explores the inherent and uneven political implications of networks, from war and viruses to multiplayer online gaming. This contrast of critic vs. creator is also present in each of his answers for this interview, thereby opening up what can be considered digital work within the humanities. ¤ MELISSA DINSMAN: How did you first come to enter what, at this point, I am broadly going to call the “digital” field? ALEXANDER GALLOWAY: I was first exposed to computers as a young person, but I really started working in the field in the fall of 1996, when I started as an intern at Rhizome.org, a nonprofit devoted to arts and technology. I stayed at Rhizome for six years, working as an editor and technical director. I also worked in the dot-com world in various capacities. But it was my work at Rhizome that was the most formative for me in terms of learning how to code, and also in terms of thinking about digitality specifically in an art and culture context. So then how did this work at Rhizome impact your progression through graduate school? Were you in graduate school and at Rhizome at the same time? Yes, working part time at Rhizome was a part of what I did while in graduate school. I have always followed a kind of parallel track approach where I pursue hands-on, applied work while also doing traditional, critical work. I’m not saying this is a formula everyone should follow, but it is a formula that I found to be useful — although it’s admittedly a huge challenge. We have a two-culture problem: the humanities and the sciences have been connected and disconnected in various ways for a long time, and it is a lot to demand of a student (or anyone) to say “be good in both of these areas.” I think the digital humanities, when done well, does require such competency. My approach has been not to reduce one to the other, or to create some kind of hybrid; my approach has been parallel, where I attempt to do both well but not necessarily together. You have already started to answer my next question, which pertains to the role of the digital in your humanities work. Do you think this qualifies as “digital humanities” work? And do you care? I definitely don’t care. I felt very much involved in the digital world before digital humanities came on the scene. When it happened, digital humanities for me seemed like a reboot of some of the things that had been happening in information science and library schools years earlier. I feel as if I am doing digital work but not really digital humanities. But I have the luxury of not needing to care. In my reading of it, DH started in English, comparative literature, and language departments. My degree is technically in literature, but I work in a media studies program. I basically studied theory in graduate school, not literature, so I was never in the pressure-cooker environment that English and language departments have vis-à-vis jobs and what counts as research. I mean what more can you really say about Shakespeare today? There isn’t a whole lot. But if you start counting words, then maybe there is something new you can say. You see this frequently in very old, extremely erudite, well-established disciplines where there is very little territory left in which to do research. I think DH has opened up a new territory. It has allowed people to find a new space. But the work is often misguided. I have always loved the old joke about DH that it is for old professors who don’t understand computers and young professors who don’t understand hermeneutics. In reality this seems to be the root of the miscommunication and all the arguments and squabbling that happens. Some people are committed to traditional hermeneutic models and feel threatened by computers, while others are real gearheads and want to crank things through their machines and produce data. I may be stacking the deck in describing the relationship in these terms, but ultimately neither extreme will work. Perhaps we need both approaches. We need people who understand hermeneutics, theories of representation, and theories of ideology, but who also understand symbolic systems and what it means to say that there is a form of writing that is executable. It’s a different way of thinking about writing and language. In that way, your work with the digital seems more unified to your critical work than for others. For example, Moretti describes his DH work as largely separate from his more traditional literary studies on the novel. To the extent that we can define DH very narrowly as using computers to reveal new knowledge, I have indeed worked in DH. For example, I have worked a lot on a game that Guy Debord created in the 1970s. Part of the evidence I use in my critique of the game was only revealed to me after I translated Debord’s off-line game into software. Here, the software gave me new knowledge. The code provided little pieces of information, allowing me to unravel the mystery of the game. And these were all things that I wouldn’t have found as a mere reader or player. I have also worked on the 1953 experiments of the Italian-Norwegian mathematician Nils Aall Barricelli, which I recreated today using computer code. Doing so allowed me to discover things about his work that would have never been available to me otherwise. I feel like I am not really a DH flag-waver, but I can see the value in using code to reveal new knowledge. Even though you are not a “DH flag-waver,” I am wondering if you think there are any digital or media subfields that yield, or will yield, the most benefit to the humanities and why? As I said, I do think we are faced with a two-cultures problem, and part of why I get frustrated with main-line digital humanities is that this problem is seldom addressed directly. There is one approach, which investigates the nature of letters and numbers, and there is another approach, which focuses on the use of letters and numbers for other ends. I think most of DH has been the latter. And, while this may be slightly unfair to DH, I do think there is a fundamental difference in method and really maybe even in culture or epistemological framing (which of course doesn’t preclude interesting mixtures and hybrids). And, of course, there are a lot of interesting people working in the field who don’t fall into this trap. I fully acknowledge this. To flesh this out a little more, I think the first approach comes out of a fundamentally modern stance that seeks to reveal “the conditions of possibility” for digitality if not symbolic systems as a whole. And, incidentally, this first approach tends to be much more historical, which is also a characteristically modern impulse, whereas the second approach tends to be more pragmatic and, one might also say, scientific. The former aims to determine the specific nature of digitality, whereas the latter aims to use digitality as a vehicle. The second approach doesn’t really care about modernity’s fundamental question as to the condition of knowledge; what it cares about is the relative obscurity or transparency of letters and numbers. So if the first approach is essentially modern, then the second is, shall we say, medieval! The second approach asks if there is a hidden or obscure detail of a text that only an algorithm can uncover. It is a kind of hermeneutics, I guess, only in reverse. Ultimately it comes down to this: if you count words in Moby-Dick, are you going to learn more about the white whale? I think you probably can — and we have to acknowledge that. But you won’t learn anything new about counting. That’s the difference between the two approaches, and I think a lot of the misunderstanding between the two methods (or cultures) of working with digitality is due to this difference. People often speak of digital work (and more frequently the digital humanities) as a means of making the humanities relevant in the 21st-century university. Do you think this statement is a fair assessment of digital work and its purpose? Do you think it is fair to the humanities? Well the old cliché from the first internet boom was that if you wanted a mediocre job at a dot-com, study computer science, but if you wanted to run the company, study semiotics. At the time an astounding number of people in the dot-com scene had studied under Donna Haraway, or written their thesis on Roland Barthes. And this is still true today. Remember the old chestnut about the humanities contributing to the formation of critical thinking skills and to the understanding of history and culture, or remember even the now passé idea of cultivating a kind of moral sensibility, that literature is a way to experience empathy and to view the world from a perspective that is not one’s own — all of these things are still true. And the whole idea that the humanities are in decline is simply false. Contrary to popular wisdom, humanities departments routinely cross-subsidize other parts of the university. Enrollment is huge in the humanities. For example my department at NYU is one of the largest in the school in terms of student enrollment (which translates to tuition dollars). When people question the relevance of the humanities they are often masking other goals and intentions. Still, the humanities needs to do a better job acknowledging digital literacy as part of their core competency. Even today, in language and literature departments, computer languages are not considered viable to the same degree as natural languages. Of course there are complex social and cultural reasons for privileging natural languages over machine languages, but in general the humanities needs to stop thinking of computation as an entirely foreign domain, and instead consider computers to be at the heart of what they have always done, that is, to understand society and culture as a technical and symbolic system. This next question is geared more toward reflecting on the digital humanities, but I think we can also think about the broader implications this might have in advocating for digital and media literacies. The question stems from a C21 post titled “The Dark Side of the Digital Humanities,” in which media scholar Richard Grusin draws connections between the emergence of DH and the increased “neoliberalization and corporatization of higher education.” I like Grusin’s work, but do you think the comparison he is making here has merit? Is there something about the digital humanities’ desire to produce that creates an alignment with neoliberal thinking? I like Grusin’s work as well. I contributed to a special issue of a journal on this “dark side” of DH that you mention, so I am sympathetic to more strident criticisms of the digital humanities. However, I’m not sure that there is a conspiracy between neoliberalism and DH, given that they are such different undertakings. The overhaul of higher education under neoliberalism is a complex process and there are many allies (or allies of convenience) that have formed. What I suspect Grusin is saying is that, in some ways, the digital humanities is one of these allies of convenience. At the very least we can itemize superficial similarities. There is obviously an interest in data-driven knowledge. Maybe we can talk about mechanical methods versus critical methods. And maybe there is a superficial relationship around efficiency, expediency, and the privileging of a mechanical logic or rationality over subjective rationality. But no, I don’t think there is a conspiracy between the digital humanities and neoliberalism. When speaking with Franco Moretti last month, he spoke of the collaboration required in DH as being antithetical to neoliberalism. I was wondering if you had any thoughts on this. Is neoliberalism about the individual and not the group? I see how that would work on paper: the neoliberal mantra that there is no society or group. But this is a tenuous connection at best. Collaboration and network-formation are bread-and-butter techniques within neoliberalism, whether in higher education or elsewhere. Just look at the way in which grant proposals and funding opportunities are built around interdisciplinary and network-forming scholarship. And DH often tends to push research methods borrowed from the sciences, which have always privileged teams. DH promotes collaboration, certainly, but that doesn’t mean it escapes dynamics of power or political economy. Let’s not forget that these are extremely hierarchical teams, teams where graduate students are often used as cheap labor, and where a primary investigator always gets his name at the top of the list even if he didn’t do most of the work. One shouldn’t glamorize the group research model in higher education. Still, such political economy questions notwithstanding, DH does indeed force us to broach the question of collaboration. Making a digital project is a lot less like writing a monograph and much more like making an independent film. For DH projects, like film, one typically requires a small team of people with various specialties. So, for practical reasons at least, the model of the sole researcher might not be entirely viable. In thinking about DH grants, you seem to be suggesting that neoliberalism in universities in part has to do with funding structures, and of course to put together a solid digital humanities research group, a fair amount of funding is needed. How is this funding typically achieved? Are universities willing to pay for DH projects despite massive cutbacks elsewhere, or is funding most likely to be found from external sources? I have an idiosyncratic position on this so I take it with a grain of salt. But I’m not sure funding is the key issue. There are some projects that need a lot of money, and there are others that don’t. I have made both types. There do seem to be a fair number of new grants that have been created for the digital humanities. But I want to reiterate that there is a real danger of industrializing the humanities and forcing a science-research lab model. These grants can sometimes have that effect. So you seem to be thinking about space and funding together, and that leads to my question about physical location. Despite its reliance on online platforms, much of the talk around the digital in the humanities today also concerns physical location — namely does the future of digital work lie in individual departments or libraries? Do you have an opinion on the best physical place for digital scholarship, and what does this say about its future role in the university? The question of facilities, funding, and labs has always been a tricky problem. Early on, there seemed to be a sort of arms race where everybody thought they had to have a computer lab. And classrooms had to be computerized as well. This introduces new financial challenges, because technology goes obsolete so quickly. So even if you staff and stock the greatest computer lab ever built, in three years time it will need to be restocked. When I first got hired at NYU, I helped build a media lab; since then my colleagues have built newer, better, and more interesting labs. But, we have also started to switch to a different approach — a lab-less approach. The idea is that we’re at a critical mass in terms of consumer electronics, and most students already have laptops or have easy access to them. So we rely instead on the students’ laptops and not on a special lab or room. And we use free and open-source software tools to teach students to code. This has worked really well. It’s an ad hoc approach that has a lot of flexibility. I want to stay on this question a little longer, because you are speaking about a lab-less environment for teaching, but in terms of doing more digitally intense work, and by this I mean digital research that requires expertise in multiple areas, do you think this work needs to stay physically in departments or be moved to a more central location, like libraries? A legitimate question, yes. I have never worked in those environments, but there are certainly projects that need intense levels of computing power. And there are also massive projects (like digitization) that require a lot of hardware and thus require more physical space. I come out of the hacker ethos, which says if you can’t accomplish it in 15 minutes on your laptop, it is not worth doing! You have already talked quite a bit about coding, but I’d like to return quickly to the question of DH students needing to learn computer languages. In the past there has been a line drawn in the digital humanities between those who code and those who don’t. Do you think full engagement with the digital humanities requires programming skills, and, if so, should programming become a requirement for humanities students? Would you trust a book on the French Revolution written by a scholar who didn’t read French? It’s a legitimate question. I’m sure there are brilliant lunar geologists who have never been to the moon. But I maintain that one must learn one’s materials — including computation and coding — in order to be competent in DH. Computer languages might not have the deep history that natural languages have, and they might not have the same kind of cultural depth that natural languages have. But in terms of relevance in contemporary life, in terms of a rich analytical and critical context, machine languages are just as fascinating as natural languages. Of course there’s the question of which language one ought to learn. For language requirements in digital literacy, one might not simply master Ruby or Python but instead master three or even four languages. It’s less important to master the specific syntax of a single computer language than it is to understand certain fundamental concepts that many languages share, concepts like variables, iteration, and subroutines. My last few questions have to do with public understanding of the digital in the humanities. To start off, I’d like to know how you think the general public understands the term “digital humanities” or, more broadly, the digital work being done in the humanities (if at all)? For example, if you are sitting on a plane and someone asks you what you do for a living, and you then explain your work in the digital, how do they usually respond? Are they engaged or are you the recipient of a blank stare? Well academics always get a blank stare when posed that question, and usually the questioner is a friend or relation! In seriousness, perhaps if we look at this issue from a slightly different point of view, the answer will be more revealing. Honestly, the general public understands the digital better than the average university professor. Consider the way in which hacking and tinkering have become today’s folk culture. We’ve just been talking about the distinction between programmers and non-programmers. But it’s not that simple. Show me a really good gamer, and I will show you a programmer — any good gamer already knows how to construct and manipulate complex symbolic systems, and this is essentially how programming works. That one thing has a more visual interface and the other thing has a more textual interface is a minor detail. Or consider contemporary art, specifically post-internet artists, who are constantly being scooped and upstaged by everyday people posting things to YouTube. I suspect digital humanists could learn a great deal from today’s vernacular digital culture. In the past, we have thought of pubic knowledge being in part distributed via the public intellectual, but you seem to be presenting a very different bottom-up theory when it comes to the digital. Of course many have bemoaned the decline of public intellectualism, including Nicholas Kristof in The New York Times as recently as last year. How does public intellectualism relate to the digital humanities? Could the digital humanities (or the digital in the humanities) be a much-needed bridge between the academy and the public, or is this perhaps expecting too much of a discipline? Lamenting the decline of the public intellectual is a time-honored tradition, particularly among intellectuals themselves. If you mean the American context in particular, let’s be honest, we don’t have public intellectuals in the US. There just aren’t very many of them. Intellectuals have never really been valued in the US, so they’ve always had to rationalize their existence (by becoming pundits, or pop philosophers, or what have you). I don’t think digital humanities is going to change that. And I don’t think digital humanities is going to give us any kind of bridge between academia (the ivory tower) and the larger general public. Cultural conservatives in particular tend to bemoan the decline of the public intellectual, from Julien Benda to the present day. So do you think then that Europe has a very different tradition? I was in Paris unfortunately during the November 13 attacks, and afterward, as part of their coverage, Le Monde ran a two-page spread of interviews with philosophers. Can you imagine The New York Times running a two-page spread of interviews with Michael Hardt and Judith Butler? It would never happen. I don’t want to glamorize the European model, which has its own problems with class and privilege, but the American model has never been similar. It goes back to the founding of the country. We are a practical, pragmatic culture. For better or worse this has colored some of our more lofty aspirations. During my interview with Moretti, he pointed out to me — and he was right — that all my questions focus on the future of the digital in the humanities. Perhaps it’s a sign of my own optimism or perhaps it reflects a certain anticipatory tone that is used in media and DH circles. My last question, however, is going to ask that you look backwards and speak to what you think the digital in the humanities has accomplished so far. My sense of digital research is a little different, but here are some accomplishments. First, we have a much better sense of the deep history of digitality, pushing back against the notion that digitality is a late 20th-century phenomenon. Scholars are examining the alphabet itself as digital. Others are considering the algorithmic quality of weaving, mosaics, and automata that go back to the 18th century if not earlier. Second, we have a much better sense of how letters and numbers work in culture and society. In the postwar period we have been able to cultivate a rich sense of the semiotic and textual component of letters and numbers. In recent years this has been supplemented by machinic textuality, or the way in which letters and numbers are machinic as well as semiotic (that is, action bound and not just meaning bound). Third, and this is perhaps the thing that mainline DH has done most poorly, but that others in media theory have taken up, is the ability to recognize and critique the specificities of the contemporary configuration of society and politics. I am thinking here of rhizomatics, horizontality, black boxes, capture, or procedurality. People have also written on the important role that difference plays within digitality. I have written a lot on networks and protocological organization and how that form of management is substantially different from bureaucracy and other forms of social organization. The last thing, and this is very idiosyncratic, is that there is also an increased understanding of the way digitality works within philosophy and particularly ontology, the subdomain of philosophy that examines being. By seeing how the digital operates within ontology, and by trying to outline what a non-digital ontology might look like, we can explore a way of thinking that is not reducible to the digital framework. FOR AT LEAST THE PAST DECADE, the term “digital humanities” (DH) has captured the imagination and the ire of scholars across American universities. Supporters of the field, which melds computer science with hermeneutics, champion it as the much needed means to shake up and expand methods of traditional literary interpretation; for most outspoken critics, it is a new fad that symbolizes the neoliberal bean-counting destroying American higher education. Somewhere in the middle of these two extremes lies a vast and varied body of work that utilizes and critically examines digital tools in the pursuit of humanistic study. This field is large and increasingly indefinable even by those in its midst. In fact, “digital humanities” seems astoundingly inappropriate for an area of study that includes, on the one hand, computational research, digital reading and writing platforms, digital pedagogy, open-access publishing, augmented texts, and literary databases, and, on the other, media archeology and theories of networks, gaming, and wares both hard and soft. As Franco Moretti said to me early in my conversation with him: “‘digital humanities’ means nothing.” It’s hard not to take such an assertion from Moretti, the author of Graphs, Maps, Trees and Distant Reading — canonized DH works, if such a thing exists — at face value, but that is what “The Digital in the Humanities” intends to do. Over the year, this series will explore the role of the digital humanities as well as the digital in the humanities as it currently exists in the US academy through conversations with both leading practitioners in the field and vocal critics of the field’s impact on humanistic inquiry. The result will be some surprising lines of overlap as well as outright disagreement. But at its heart, this series is a means to explore the intersection of the digital and the humanities, and this intersection’s impact on research and teaching, American higher education, and the increasingly tenuous connection between the ivory tower of elite institutions and the general public. I begin this series with a leader of the digital field, Franco Moretti, whose work at Stanford University as The Danily C. and Laura Louise Bell Professor in the Humanities and the founder of the now famous Literary Lab, speaks to what he calls a divided scholarship that “[doesn’t] add up to a whole.” This is a position to which his numerous publications speak. Over the past 20 years, he has written the more “traditional” Modern Epic, Atlas of the European Novel, 1800-1900, and The Bourgeois, as well as the computationally inclined Graphs, Maps, Trees and Distant Reading. And while Moretti seems not entirely comfortable with the divided nature of his scholarship, he is also adamant that this is a division he is not willing to give up. This tension is present at Moretti’s best moments in this interview and in his writings, and is why, despite his well-respected stature within both the traditional and digital humanities fields, his computational work is often the subject of much debate, even within the Los Angeles Review of Books. But this tension between the traditional and computational, between close and distant readings — and Moretti is always the best of close readers even when reading the distant — is what makes Moretti’s scholarship so impressive and important to the 21st-century humanities. ¤ MELISSA DINSMAN: Like me, you come from a literary background, so how did you first come to enter what we will broadly call, at this point, the digital field? FRANCO MORETTI: I have been interested in a scientific approach to literature for a long time, since the late-1980s when I wrote on evolutionary theory in literature. From here I moved to geography and wrote the Atlas of the European Novel. While doing geographical research, I realized that quantitative methods helped considerably with mapmaking. So I became interested in quantitative approaches to history of all kinds. Around 2000-2001, I gave a series of lectures at the University of California, Berkeley that pulled all these threads together. This became the book Graphs, Maps, Trees. But the lucky moment was that right then Matt Jockers came to Stanford as a technology specialist. We met and started working together. So for me, digital humanities was really like the fourth or fifth station along a much longer course, which also means that I’ve never seen digital humanities as, so to speak, a total novelty as some of its practitioners do. For me it’s basically the form taken in the digital age by scientific, explanatory, empirical, rationalistic, call it what you want, approaches to the history of literature and culture. This is interesting, because what you are describing sounds like a very natural progression, rather than say something that was always external to your field of study. At this point in your career, how would you describe the role that the digital plays in your work? You’ve used the phrase “digital humanities.” Do you think of your work as part of the digital humanities or is it something much larger? No. First of all the term “digital humanities” means nothing. Computational criticism has more meaning, but now we all use the term “digital humanities” — me included. I would say that DH occupies about 50 percent of my work. You can’t possibly know this, but when my last two books were going to be published — Distant Reading and The Bourgeois — I convinced my publisher (and it took some convincing) to have them come out on the same day because they were for me two sides of the coin of the work I tried to do. And what I find potentially interesting is that the two sides don’t add up to a whole. I do things in the mode of Distant Reading that I could never do in the mode of The Bourgeois. But it also works the other way around. When I write a book with zero digital humanities content, or very little, like The Bourgeois, I find myself doing things that I cannot do with the other approach. Exactly what things are available in the one and in the other and are they mutually exclusive, I still haven’t figured out how to think about this. But for me, this is going to be the problem for the years to come because I don’t want to give up any of these two realities. They are equally dear to me. So there hasn’t been a sort of natural blending then into some sort of whole. It is still very much separate. It is. I am loosely planning a book on tragic form, which occasionally I try to conceive as a unification of the two. Who knows. This is planning. It is easy to plan. Doing is a different thing. Are there any digital or media subfields in particular that you think yield the most benefit to the humanities and why? I don’t see a special area. What I would be very interested in reflecting upon is the different fates, the different destinies, so far of the digital approach in literature, history, and art history, because DH has clearly functioned very differently in those three fields. And why has it functioned so differently? Many of your questions have to do with the humanities in general and this would be an interesting way to try to figure out why this DH approach is much more productive in literature than in the two other cases. Not that we’ve done anything earth-shattering, but it’s clear that English departments have done more than the others in this field. In fact, as you know, I am currently in Switzerland, and there are several universities here that are beginning to think in these terms by organizing discussions between historians, literary critics, and art historians. I think this kind of enlarging of the panorama will be more fruitful, rather than splitting hairs within the literary digital humanities. We need it. It’s a little claustrophobic in our field. Part of what you seem to be gesturing toward in your discussion of interdisciplinary collaboration comes down to physical space, which brings up an interesting and somewhat ironic problem relating to the need digital projects have for a rather large amount of real estate in an institution. Despite its reliance on online platforms, much of the talk around the digital in the humanities today also concerns physical location — namely does the future of digital work lie in individual departments or libraries? Do you have an opinion on the best physical place for digital scholarship, and what does this say about its future role in the university? The empirical answer is that libraries are certainly moving forward. When you look at job offers, a lot of them are in libraries or library-like environments. I’ve done what I’ve done and I stand by it. I think the solution for digital research is a lab attached to a department. That is to say with the department as its reference, but not exactly an organ of the department. The lab would have its own autonomy. It’s clearly a precarious situation and honestly it would make sense to look to the sciences to see the ways in which a biology lab and the biology department function together. The way I see these labs is attached, but not co-extensive with the department — appendixes of the departments. So how would separate lab space work toward your idea of an increased “panoramic” view of the humanities? At the Stanford Literary Lab we are part of a three-lab environment and one of the three labs is for historical research. But somehow in English there are many more grad students than in history, so there hasn’t been a real synergy. In reality, functioning labs are still extremely rare. There are a lot of things that call themselves labs, but many of them don’t do lab-like research and publication. So we have to see how things evolve. I think we are verging on talking about the relevance of the digital humanities for the larger institution and not just specific departments. People often speak of digital work (and more frequently the digital humanities) as a means of making the humanities relevant for the 21st-century university. Do you think this statement is a fair assessment of digital work and its purpose? Do you think it is fair to the humanities to say that DH will come in on a white horse and save the humanities from itself? Neither one. The humanities will need to save themselves, and not only for the crass reason that going to university can cost an insane amount of money, so students choose to go into business, medicine, economics, etc., to remake the money as soon as possible. It’s not just that, although that cannot be simply dismissed. In the 20th century the natural sciences have produced some amazingly stunning and beautiful theories in physics, and genetics, and in biology. The humanities have produced nothing of this sort. Literature, art, in a sense even political history (mostly in a horrendous way), have produced enormously interesting objects, but the study of these objects, that is to say the disciplines of the humanities — the study of literature, the study of history — have lagged behind. The humanities have lagged behind in conceptual imagination and in boldness. I totally understand why a 20-year old would choose to do astrophysics rather than literature. It’s so much more interesting in many ways, just for the pleasure of the intelligence. That is what the humanities have to work on. Another solution that is often presented as a “way out” for the humanities is interdisciplinary work, to which DH seems to naturally lend itself. Interdisciplinary work won’t solve the problem. Interdisciplinary work is even harder than disciplinary work. It’s even more chancy and random. You have to be lucky as hell because you move blindly. Now, are the digital humanities heading towards making the humanities as a whole, let’s say literature in my case, relevant in terms of beautiful theories and high-order conceptualization? No. Not yet, at least. That’s what I care about. I don’t care if the humanities have bar graphs in every paper, like The Financial Times, which I think in a newspaper there should be, but not necessarily in literature. No, to make the humanities relevant you need something much bigger than the digital humanities. What the humanities need are large theories and bold concepts. Another complaint often lodged against the digital humanities is that it is a sign of the increasing neoliberalism of academic institutions. For example, in a C21 post titled “The Dark Side of Digital Humanities,” media scholar Richard Grusin draws connections between the emergence of DH and the increased “neoliberalization and corporatization of higher education.” Do you think such a comparison has merit? Is there something about the digital humanities’ desire to produce that creates an alignment with neoliberal thinking? Digital humanities is not more productive than the humanities in general, so that certainly is not it. There definitely is a neoliberal offensive against the universities and an important component of that is that basically more and more research sectors are asked to find money outside of the university. Digital humanities is enjoying a lot of grants, and so it may be seen as having a good time in this new era. But DH is not part of the attack. It’s simply because of the policy of funding agencies suffering less from the attack. I don’t see DH as having a political agenda in any way aligned with the neoliberal offense. Think of one thing: digital humanities is introducing within the humanities, group work, systematically. One could claim that group work is actually the opposite of the individualistic ethos, competition at all costs, typical of the universities. Does this mean that the digital humanities has a socialist bent, not at all. It’s just that that’s the way it has to work if it wants to work. Grusin’s article has a lot of good sense in it. But the general idea that the digital humanities are aligned with the big tech companies is simply not true. That brings us to the question of funding. To put together a solid digital humanities research group, a fair amount of funding is needed. How is this funding typically achieved? Are universities willing to pay for DH projects despite massive cutbacks elsewhere, or is funding most likely to be found from external sources? Honestly I don’t know. You will have to ask the other interviewees. I can tell you that when we launched the lab we got $20,000 from Stanford for the first two years, with which we had to buy everything: computers, screens, and all other expenses. Then there was more money that came, part from the university and part from some grants, which are usually international grants. But you know, six years later, we still have neither a programmer nor an archivist librarian. We don’t even have 10 percent of a programmer or a librarian. We have a grad student who is a great programmer and there is a junior faculty in English who is a great programmer, but we don’t have a dedicated programmer. There has been money that has come, and will continue to come in the future, both from within and without the institution. I’ve wasted an enormous amount of time raking together the money so that the lab can just survive. I’m sure there are places that have it harder than we do and places that have it better. But I can just speak for what has happened at Stanford. I think it will useful to see how different institutions are approaching this question of funding differently. From my experience there doesn’t seem to be consensus on how to fund or house digital labs and centers. It often seems people are making it up as they go along, and this includes determining which grants are available. Let’s switch gears, now, and talk about coding. In the past there has been a line drawn in the digital humanities between those who code and those who don’t. Do you think full engagement with the digital humanities requires programming skills and if so, should programming become a requirement for humanities students? I don’t code and if someone were to say I really don’t belong to this new area, I would try to argue for leniency towards people who were already too old to learn coding, but I would understand. And it is not just a matter of “come on, let me in, I’ve done so much to give respectability to the field.” It’s not that. It’s that coding, and I see this in young grad students or younger colleagues, allows them to have a type of intelligence and intuitions that I don’t have and will never have. It’s an intelligence that takes the form of writing a script, but in the writing of the script there is also the beginning of a concept, very often not expressed as a concept, but that you can see that it was there from the results that the coding produces. Perhaps the best example in the case of the Literary Lab was Pamphlet #4, which was written by two grad students who invented their own script. I envy them that form of intelligence, knowing that I will never have it. And I like it. I think that actually many of the most promising results in the future will come from scripts that are half scripts / half cultural, literary, historical concept. And so I think that universities that have a digital humanities program, minor, major, should make sure that everybody gets a chance at having that type of intelligence. Since this is for the Los Angeles Review of Books, a publication that extends beyond a strictly academic readership, I wonder what is your impression of how the general public understands the term “digital humanities” or, more broadly, the digital work being done in the humanities (if at all)? If you are on a plane and you talk to the person next to you and say, “I work in the digital humanities at Stanford,” do you get a blank stare? What do you think their knowledge base is? And do you think they should know that there is this entire trend or field emerging within the humanities? They should know if it is worth knowing about. But that cannot be my decision. That should be your decision and you’ve decided that they should be informed in some form or another. And what I’m saying applies to literature and art more than history. The way in which, say through newspapers, the general public has knowledge of literary study or of approaches to literature, is still very normative. You read reviews that tell you if a book or a film is good or bad. And the same for art shows, and so on. Digital humanities is as non-normative as one can get in the field of literature. It is much more towards the explanatory. So to make it interesting for the general public, a major revolution in the way in which literature is approached by the media would be necessary. Will this revolution happen? No. Should this revolution happen? I’m not even sure. I have devoted my life to explanation rather than value judgment. On the other hand, I am not sure that for society-at-large, for the world-at-large, explanation is more important than value judgment. I think it is more important for people who devote their lives to try to understand how things work. I know that I have never had so colossal of misunderstandings as I have had in interviews with newspapers about the digital humanities, or in newspaper articles about my work in the digital humanities. Why do you think newspapers are getting it wrong? Newspapers have plenty of good writers who review books, films, plays, etc. and then there are these eggheads inside English departments doing these calculations that seem so completely beside the point. I think that may be the problem. That may be it. It seems like a strange waste of time. But I don’t want to put myself in the heads of journalists. So perhaps the digital humanities are too foreign to journalists who typically write about literature and film. That’s probably a good way to put it. So we are at my last question for you; although we still have the surprise question that you formulated to come at the end. I want to continue this focus on the public’s relationship with the academy through digital work, but think about it in terms of public intellectualism. We are supposedly in an age that has seen a decline in the public intellectual (as Nicholas Kristof opined in The New York Times as recently as last year). What role, if any, do you think digital work plays? Could the digital humanities (or the digital in the humanities) be a much-needed bridge between the academy and the public, or is this perhaps expecting too much of a discipline? I left Italy for the US 25 years ago and I was already 40, so I had been working for a while. I had published a couple of books and had been writing on and off for newspapers. When I left, I would have described myself, perhaps, as an intellectual. Now, I am not. I am certainly a professor — so someone much more confined in a specialty. And I think the digital humanities has made me more of a professor than I was say 15 years ago, because it requires so much technical knowledge and an exchange between you and your peers. I don’t think the digital humanities now, or for the foreseeable future, is a particularly good wager to revitalize the public intellectual. Public intellectuals can be revitalized if politics is revitalized and honestly the signals in that direction are scarce, to put it mildly, in the US but also in Europe. Now for my question back to you. I was entertained often in your questions, expressions such as “could,” “should,” “is it likely to,” “the future,” “the purpose,” etc., and very little, if anything at all, referred to the past. There wasn’t a single question that asked, “Has the digital humanities done anything?” Leave aside what it can do in the future; has it done anything? And I find this fascinating. Somehow digital humanities has managed to secure for itself this endless infancy, in which, it is always a future promise. And of course this is reflected very much in the grant culture that supports it. Grants are all about what you promise you will be doing in the next three years, which is a way of asking to be fooled, or of encouraging salesmanship. It’s a perversion of intellectual judgment. Intellectual judgment ought to judge what has been done, not to just be a promise for the future. There should be a little room for that, but just a little. The answer that I would give to my own question, but that you should ask other people if you think it’s important… I think I will. It is a blind spot in my own thinking about the digital’s place in humanities work. …is that the results so far have been below expectations. Now, it’s true that the field is at the beginning still. It’s true that much of scientific research is so called normal science, and it’s certainly true that traditional literary criticism is not sending off sparks every day. All of this is true, but it is also irrelevant because digital humanities are claiming to be the big novelty and so far I think I have produced little evidence about that. I don’t want to push it too far. I don’t want to say there is not evidence, because it is complicated. Evidence comes in many forms. At times it is conceptual refinement and at times corroboration is a form of evidence, and it is a form of important evidence. But in the humanities it is often not considered important. Perhaps one of the most important things DH should address in the coming phase is the nature of its own results — how to evaluate them — and if necessary, why is it, considering the amount of energy, talent, and tools, going into it, that we have such difficulty producing great results. I think, and think others in the field would agree, that our work could have been better. I think that’s a strength though, to perpetually think “that could be better.” I think that’s the sign of a growing field. And I think that’s what gives us a future-facing focus. There is a perpetual need to make it better, more accurate, in order to build the discipline.  I agree. But again, think of this: to make it better — it’s a perfect expression because it’s a comparative, it was good and now it’s more good — this is not how the humanities think in general. It’s usually much more of a polemical, an all-or-nothing affair. It’s a conflict of interpretation. It’s: you thought Hamlet was the protagonist of Hamlet, how foolish of you; the protagonist is Osric. Digital humanities doesn’t work in this mode and I think there is something very adult and very sober in not working in this mode. There is also something, maybe especially for older people like me, which is always a little disappointing: the digital humanities lacks that free song — the bubbliness of the best example of the old humanities. 